General and Wallet
→
Fiat Account and Conversion Service
→
→
Staking
→
CFD Trading
→
Best Execution Policy
→
Complaints Handling Procedure
→
Complaint Form
→
Fees and Limits
→
Bug Bounty
→
→
Privacy Policy
→
Cookie Policy
→
General Risk Disclosure
→
Campaign Terms and Conditions
→
Legal Documents
These are the terms and conditions of using the services of Change divided into specific chapters. By signing up you agree that you have read, understood, and accept all of the relevant terms and conditions. If you do not agree or fail to adhere to these or any other rules of any of the services, you are not entitled to use the services.
These Terms and Conditions are available in other languages for information purposes, in any case and if there is any semantic discrepancy, the English version will prevail.
In force from 2024-12-17
General and Wallet
These are the general terms and conditions of using the services of Change. By signing up through our Website or Apps you agree that you have read, understood, and accepted all of the Terms. If you do not agree or fail to adhere to the terms and conditions or any other rules of any of the services, you are not entitled to use the services.
The Website and the Services offered by Change are NOT ADDRESSED TO AND MAY NOT BE USED BY:
persons who DO NOT have their citizenship or their legal place of residence in any of the contracting states of the European Economic Area, except the Netherlands; and
natural persons who are NOT at least 18 years of age; or
legal persons who have been established outside of Estonia or whose place of business or ownership structure is not located in Estonia. Services are limited to private and public limited companies, whose every member of the management board and (ultimate) beneficial owner(s) have an Account at all times.
1. What terms and definitions do we use?
As used in these Terms, including the preamble hereof, unless expressly otherwise stated or evident in the context, the following capitalised terms and expressions shall have the following meanings:
Account
– the account opened with Change by a User, using which the User can access and use the Services, including Business Account;
Apps
– the web, Android and iOS mobile apps of Change, which give access to the Services;
Business Account
– the account opened with Change by a User, who is a legal person, using which the User can access and use the specific and limited Services, which are shown in the Apps;
Change
– xChange AS, an Estonian public limited company registered under registry code 14428150, Rävala pst 4, 10143 Tallinn. References to “we”, “us” and “our” mean references to Change and/or if applicable Change Securities B.V.;
Conversion Rate
– the price or exchange rate of one unit of a given supported cryptocurrency whereby the price of the offered asset is determined by Change. Conversion Rate is derived from multiple factors, such as direct and indirect asset acquisition cost and market risk to which Change is exposed to while completing the transaction, Rate Reference as indicative price point, as well as conversion fee as described in the chapter
Fees and Limits
;
Conversion Service
– regulated service of cryptocurrency conversion (for which Change has been issued a licence by the Estonian Financial Intelligence Unit, no FVT000072) through which Users can buy supported cryptocurrencies from Change, in exchange for specified Fiat currencies and other supported cryptocurrencies and specified Fiat currencies from Change, in exchange for supported cryptocurrencies, including the services of Market Order, Limit Order and Stop Order;
Crypto Interest Account
– proprietary wallets of Change operated either by Bitgo, Inc. or Payward, Inc. where Change deposits supported cryptocurrencies on behalf of customers for the purpose of earning and redistributing staking reward, i.e. interest;
Custodian
– the person who holds and is responsible for the safekeeping of the cryptocurrencies and/or tokens (including the Tokens) transferred to or held in the Wallet by the User, who at the date of these terms and conditions is Bitgo Inc.;
Fees and Limits
– full list of fees and limits of Services as described in the chapter
Fees and Limits
;
Fiat
– currency that has been declared as legal tender by a government and is regulated by a central financial institution, i.e. the euro;
Instant Deposit
– Service allowing Users to add funds to their Fiat Account instantly by using their EEA-issued credit or debit card (limited up to 3 different cards) with the fee described in the chapter
Fees and Limits
;
Investment Gold
or
PAXG
– a cryptocurrency created by Paxos Trust Company, LLC (hereinafter: Paxos), which is backed by investment gold as defined in Precious Metal Articles Act § 2(9), specifically each PAXG token is backed by one fine troy ounce (t oz) of a 400 oz London Good Delivery gold bar;
Limit Order
– Service, whereby User submits an instruction to complete the transaction in the future when the price of the supported cryptocurrency has been risen above the Rate Reference set by the User has been reached;
Market Order
– Service, whereby User submits an instruction to complete the transaction immediately;
Party
– each of the User and Change;
Passive Account
– a status assigned internally by Change to all Accounts that have not had any transactions related to Conversion Service during the period of 90 consecutive days;
Rate Reference
– the price of one unit of a supported cryptocurrency in terms of a specified Fiat currency or another supported cryptocurrency, which is based on the lowest ask price for buying or the highest bid price for selling a cryptocurrency on the exchanges operated by trusted third party vendors;
Services
– services provided by Change and/or Change Securities B.V. to the Users, including the Wallet and the Conversion services;
Staking
– cryptoasset service, whereby the User is rewarded for buying supported cryptocurrencies from Change and allowing these to be deposited on Kraken Account as described in chapter
Staking
;
Stop Order
– Service, whereby User submits an instruction to complete the transaction in the future when the price of the supported cryptocurrency has been fallen below the Rate Reference set by the User;
Taxes
‒ taxes, levies, duties or similar governmental assessments of any nature, including, for example, value-added, sales, use or withholding taxes, assessable by any jurisdiction whatsoever;
Terms
– these Terms and Conditions including all the chapters, as amended from time to time
‍
;
User
– anyone who uses the Website, Apps and/or Services provided by Change. References to “you” and “your” mean references to the User;
Wallet
‒ User’s cryptocurrency wallet, which can be accessed via the Website or the Apps, and which is a regulated service (for which Change has been issued a licence by the Estonian Financial Intelligence Unit, no FVT000072), as further described in section 6 below, including the Services of Cryptocurrency withdrawal and Cryptocurrency deposit;
Website
– websites located at
https://changeinvest.com/
and at all subdomains.
2. What are the conditions for opening the Account?
2.1. To use any of the Services, which might be provided for a fee as stated in Fees and Limits, you must open the Account and any such use must be done through the Account. One digital identity associated with the Account will be used for accessing all Services.
2.2. Each User must be at least 18 years of age to register for an Account or to use any of the Services. Users may not allow third parties to access their Account or let them use the Services on their behalf.
2.3. In order to register for a Business Account, the legal entity must be established in and have its place of business in Estonia, including all of its members of the board, shareholders and beneficial owners must be residents and/or citizens of Estonia. To open a Business Account all of the members of the board and the beneficial owners of the legal person must at all times be our Users as natural persons, who have successfully transferred Fiat funds onto their Account in accordance with Fiat Account and Conversion Service clause 2.1, and whose Account(s) have not been closed.
2.4. We reserve the right to unilaterally decide whether to open an Account and/or whether to provide Services to any persons and shall have no obligation to justify or outline the reasons for any rejection.
2.5. All information that you provide to us at any time (including but not limited to the information provided upon the opening of the Account) must be accurate, current and complete and may not be misleading in any respect. We may, from time to time, request such information to be provided and/or updated, in which case you are required to provide us with the information without delay. If you are unable or unwilling to provide or update such information or it is incorrect, we have the right to deny opening the Account, close the Account and/or restrict the usage of the Services.
2.6. You acknowledge that using the Services is limited to the amounts as described in the chapter Fees and Limits.
2.7. By opening an Account and using the Services, each User fully acknowledges that Change does not provide to the User any investment service or advice. Each User fully acknowledges that any information, product or service provided by us on our Website or Apps is not considered investment advice or recommendation, and independent professional advice should be sought where appropriate.
3. What are the risks?
3.1. By using the Services you acknowledge that various types of risks are involved, including but not limited to risks relating to the fluctuation of the value of any assets related to the Services, technical imperfections of cryptocurrencies, the Website and the Apps, regulatory uncertainties, and risks related to our operations and financial viability. As our Users are taking risks and are exposed to them through our Services, we strongly recommend and encourage you to learn and gain a sufficient understanding of the risks involved prior to using our Services.
3.2. We encourage you to consult with a financial advisor or other appropriate professional prior to starting to use the Services.
4. What are the geographical restrictions of using the Services?
4.1. Change administers and operates the Website and Apps from its location in Estonia. Although the Website and Apps are accessible worldwide, not all features, products or services discussed, referenced, provided or offered through or on our Website or Apps are available to all persons or in all geographic locations, nor are they appropriate or available for use outside Estonia.
4.2. We reserve the right to limit, in our sole discretion and without providing any justification related thereto, the provision and quantity of any feature, product or Service to any person or geographic area.
4.3. Any offer for any feature, product or Service made through or on our Website or Apps is void where prohibited.
4.4. By choosing to access the Website or download or access any of the Apps from outside Estonia, you are solely responsible for complying with applicable local laws.
5. How to keep the Account safe and secure?
5.1. You are responsible for maintaining adequate security and control of any and all login IDs, passwords, private keys, personal identification numbers (PINs), and any other codes or devices which are intended to or can otherwise be used to access the Account and/or use the Services.
5.2. You must prevent unauthorised access to the Account and unauthorised use of the Services, your account credentials or private keys, and must promptly notify us of any such unauthorised access or use.
5.3. In the event of an investigation of any suspected unauthorised access to the Account or use of the Services you must fully and timely cooperate with us in order to successfully solve the issue.
5.4. You are solely responsible, and to the maximum extent permissible under applicable legal acts, and we will have no liability, for any activity that takes place on your Account if the Account has been accessed with your account credentials, regardless of whether or not you authorised such access.
6. What is the Wallet service?
6.1. We provide the service of a cryptocurrency wallet pertaining to your Wallet. The Wallet service entails enabling you to interface with certain cryptocurrency networks listed in the Apps and on our Website, and if applicable to view and transmit information about public cryptographic keys. We have the right to unilaterally decide and change the cryptocurrencies which can be stored in the Wallet using the Wallet service or converted using the Conversion Service.
6.2. Upon using the Wallet service in addition to adhering to these Terms you agree to fully abide by the terms and conditions of the Custodian.
6.3. We are not a custodian of any cryptocurrency and/or tokens transferred to or held in the Wallet. All cryptocurrencies and tokens are held by the Custodian. We reserve the right to change the Custodian at any time, without prior notification or justification thereto. To the maximum extent permissible under applicable legal acts, we assume no liability for any possible damages caused by the Custodian.
6.4. Upon the creation of the Account, except for Business Account, the Wallet is automatically created for you, together with a public key, which serves as the address of the Wallet. We have the sole right to decide at our own discretion whether or not to disclose that public key to you and we may at any time, and without any prior notice, not disclose the public key to you.
6.5. To transmit information concerning the Account to the relevant cryptocurrency network (i.e. to carry out a transaction with cryptocurrency), two private keys (out of three private keys in total) are required. One of such private keys is held by us, the other by the Custodian and the third is held by a third-party backup service provider.
6.6. We do not own or control the underlying software protocols which govern the operation of cryptocurrencies held in the Wallet. Such protocols are subject to changes in protocol rules, which are outside our control and may materially affect the value, function, or name of the relevant cryptocurrency. You acknowledge and agree that:
6.6.1. we are not responsible for operation of the underlying cryptocurrency protocols and that we make no guarantee of their functionality, security, or availability; and
6.6.2. if a change in the software protocol related to the cryptocurrency occurs, we may suspend the Wallet service, and may decide not to provide Wallet service for the cryptocurrency being affected or may configure the Wallet service to enable you to transfer the affected cryptocurrency.
6.7. While using the services of Cryptocurrency withdrawal and Cryptocurrency deposit, you are only able to transfer supported cryptocurrencies, which are stated in the Apps and on the Website, e.g. BTC and ETH, but not PAXG. We are not liable and shall not compensate you for any losses or damages, if you use the services of Cryptocurrency withdrawal and Cryptocurrency deposit with cryptocurrencies that are not supported.
6.8. Due to the nature of distributed ledger technology and blockchains you acknowledge that while using the services of Cryptocurrency withdrawal and Cryptocurrency deposit none of the transactions, which have been confirmed and added to the respective main ledger, cannot be reversed and you are fully liable for the transactions you have confirmed and ordered us to process.
6.9 Due to the nature of blockchain protocols and the lack of in advance knowledge of the network, gas or similar fees, Change is unable to determine the exact Cryptocurrency withdrawal fee before the specific transaction has been confirmed by miners. The Cryptocurrency withdrawal fee shown to you in the Apps is automatically calculated by Change after every 5 minutes by taking into account the concurrent price of the specific network, gas or similar fee and the relevant price predictions, regardless of the priority in the memory, transaction or other similar pool. While using the service of Cryptocurrency withdrawal, you agree to pay the specific Cryptocurrency withdrawal fee shown to you in the Apps by confirming the Cryptocurrency withdrawal in your email or in the Apps.
7. What are the customer due diligence measures?
7.1. In order to manage the risk of money laundering and terrorist financing, and to abide by the statutory obligations applicable to us and to you for using our Services, we and you are obliged to follow certain principles of customer due diligence, as further specified in this section.
7.2. You are not allowed to use the Services nor the Wallet for any activities which are related to or facilitate money laundering, terrorist financing or any illegal activity whatsoever.
7.3. We reserve the right to, at any time:
7.3.1. identify you;
7.3.2. request from you any documents, either as originals or as copies and information (including personal), which we consider appropriate and/or relevant for the identification or for the mitigation of money laundering and terrorist financing risks;
7.3.3. regularly control your data and documents which are used for identification and/or for the mitigation of money laundering and terrorist financing risks;
7.3.4. transfer and disclose any information and documents received in accordance with this section to any and all governmental authorities and other persons to whom we are obliged to transfer and disclose information and documents in accordance with applicable legal acts;
7.3.5. transfer and disclose any information and documents received in accordance with this section to any and all third-party service providers, which we use to fulfil our obligations related to client identification and money laundering and terrorist financing prevention; and
7.3.6. transfer and disclose any information and documents received in accordance with this section to the Custodian, if applicable.
7.4. You acknowledge that we may upon the fulfilment of our obligations related to client identification and money laundering and terrorist financing prevention use the services of third-party service providers, and you hereby grant an irrevocable and unconditional consent to such use of third-party service providers and the transfer and disclosure of information to such third-party service providers.
7.5. You acknowledge that we may transfer and disclose to the Custodian any information and documents referred to in this section for the purpose of allowing the Custodian to fulfil their obligations related to client identification and money laundering and terrorist financing prevention, and you hereby grant an irrevocable and unconditional consent to such transfer and disclosure of information.
7.6. You are obliged to immediately inform us in writing of any information that might be relevant in accordance with this section and/or changes to the provided information and documents, inter alia:
7.6.1. change of your name, address or other contact information;
7.6.2. change of data regarding your identity document;
7.6.3. change of persons in the management board, beneficial owners or ownership structure;
7.6.4. the fact that you, any member of the management board or beneficial owner has become or is no longer a politically exposed person and/or a relative or a close associate of one; and
7.6.5. loss or theft of your identity document or credentials used for the Account or Services.
7.7. You are obliged to inform us in writing of any other information which might be relevant in relation to client identification and money laundering and terrorist financing prevention, immediately after becoming aware of such information.
7.8. You are obliged to fully and timely cooperate with us upon the gathering of information and documents referred to in this section, as well as the fulfilment of any other obligations we have in relation to client identification and money laundering and terrorist financing prevention under applicable legal acts. Should you refrain from cooperation with us in accordance with this section, we have the right or legal obligation to:
7.8.1. stop the provision of any Services;
7.8.2. block the Account and limit your access to the Website and the Apps;
7.8.3. withhold any payments made by or to you in relation to the Services; and/or
7.8.4. close the Account.
7.9. In addition to clause 7.8, we reserve the right to block the usage of your Account and limit your access to the Website and the Apps, when we suspect that:
7.9.1. the Account is being used by any person other than you;
7.9.2. an offence is being committed, using the Account; and/or
7.9.3. any of the information or documents provided by you to us or our third-party service providers may be untrue, and you do not provide sufficient and/or satisfactory evidence, proving the correctness of the information and documents.
7.10. To the maximum extent permissible under applicable legal acts, we assume no liability for any losses or damages caused to you or any other persons by the actions provided for in this section.
8. How to close the Account?
8.1. You have the right to close your Account at any time, provided that you have no obligations towards us nor the Custodian. From the moment of closing the Account, you shall not be entitled to use any of the Services.
8.2. In addition to specific circumstances described elsewhere in these Terms, we reserve the right to close your Account:
8.2.1. without any justification, by giving you an advance notice of at least 14 days and refunding you the market value of any assets which you have in the Wallet, for which such services have not yet been provided and cannot be provided after the closing of the Account;
8.2.2. in case you breach: (i) these Terms; (ii) the terms and conditions of the Wallet Custodian; or (iii) any other terms and conditions of the Services or otherwise binding on you, without giving any notice in advance;
8.2.3. in case you act in a manner that is threatening, abusive or racially discriminative to our staff or any of our representatives, without giving any notice in advance;
8.2.4. in case we have any suspicions of money laundering or terrorist financing, fraud or other criminal activity, without giving any notice in advance; and/or
8.2.5. in case closure of the Account is required by a competent authority, without giving any notice in advance.
8.3. If we have closed your Account without giving any notice in advance the cryptocurrencies held at your Account shall be automatically converted into specified Fiat funds by us and transferred to your bank account from which a payment had been previously made in accordance with the law.
8.4. If we identify that you have transferred Fiat funds belonging to third parties and/or used creditor debit cards owned by third parties while using the Service of Instant Deposit, we reserve the right to return these funds to the respective third parties.
8.5. Once an Account has been closed, it cannot be re-opened in the future. However, we may make exceptions to this general rule on a case-by-case basis.
9. What are the liabilities of the Parties?
9.1. You agree and are liable for the payment of all fees. Fees for Services, as amended from time to time, can be found in the chapter
Fees and Limits
, which shall form part of the Terms.
9.2. You are liable for and shall compensate Change any and all damages (including the loss of profits), which arise from your activities.
9.3. You agree that Change has the right to place a Market Order on behalf of you to settle any outstanding or delinquent payment of any fee or other types of liability. The Market Order will be placed for the cryptocurrency in the Wallet that has the biggest market capitalisation as per the order determined by Change. All respective fees apply to this transaction.
9.4. We are liable for and shall compensate you only direct monetary damages (and for the avoidance of doubt, no indirect damages or loss of profits) and only on the condition that such damages are caused to you by us either intentionally or due to gross negligence.
9.5. Our liability is reduced by the amount equal to the damages which you could have avoided by taking reasonable efforts.
9.6. In addition to the limitations described elsewhere in these Terms, to the maximum extent permissible under applicable legal acts, we assume no liability for any damages caused by third parties (including but not limited to the Custodian) or by circumstances outside our control (including but not limited to volatility of cryptocurrencies).
10. What about information technology and intellectual property?
10.1. Unless otherwise stated, all materials including, but not limited to, logos, brand names, designs, images, photographs, video clips, written are copyrights, trademarks, service marks, and any other forms of intellectual property present in the Services or displayed in connection with the Services (e.g. in the Website), protected by registration or not, are owned by or licensed to us. The foregoing also applies towards any software solutions or parts of it, programs and code present in the Service.
10.2. We grant you a limited, non-exclusive, not sub-licensable licence to access and use the materials, as specified in this section of these Terms, for your personal use, as required for the use of Services.
10.3. You are not allowed to sell, distribute, publicly display, modify, otherwise alter or make any derivative use of the materials, as specified in this section, or any portion thereof, unless you have been granted an express and written prior permission to do so by us.
10.4. The licence granted under this section will automatically terminate upon the closing of the Account. Thereafter you are no longer allowed to access or use any part of the material belonging to us.
10.5. In case your actions or activities conducted in connection with the Service or while using the Service (including but not limited, through providing us feedback or leaving any comments addressed us) amount to copyright protected work under applicable legislation, you will automatically grant to us, from the moment of the creation of such work, a non-exclusive, world-wide, sub-licensable, free-of-charge licence, which is valid until the copyright is protected under applicable legislation, in relation to such work.
10.6. As stated in this section, we retain full ownership and/or exclusive licence of any software, program, code or parts of it. The foregoing might be protected by security measures, which you are not authorised to change, disseminate, hack or alter in any way.
11. Are there any other legal matters you should consider?
11.1. It is your sole responsibility to determine whether, and to what extent, any Taxes apply to any transactions you conduct through the Apps and Website or are associated with the Services, and to withhold, collect, report and remit the correct amounts of Taxes to the appropriate tax authorities. Your transaction history is available through the Apps. The fees collected by us do not include any Taxes.
11.2. We may unilaterally amend these Terms without providing any advance notice or justification thereto. Any amendments to the Terms shall take effect as of uploading them to the Website and making them accessible in the Apps.
11.3. Our failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of these Terms will not constitute a waiver of that right or provision.
11.4. If any part of these Terms is held to be invalid or unenforceable, such determination shall not invalidate any other provision of these Terms.
11.5. You agree that we may assign these Terms (either collectively or each right and/or obligation separately, as decided by us) to our parent company, affiliate or subsidiary without your consent. You may not assign any rights or obligations you have under these Terms without our prior written approval.
11.6. These Terms are governed by the laws of Estonia. Any dispute, controversy or claim arising out of or in connection with these Terms, or the breach, termination or invalidity hereof, which the Parties have failed to solve by negotiations will be settled in Harju County Court.
11.7. These Terms and all communication is published and provided in English. We may publish translated versions of these Terms or any chapter therein in any language other than English, however these versions are of informational nature. Should there by any discrepancies or deviations between the languages, the English version shall prevail.
In force from 2024-12-17
Fiat account and Conversion Service
1.  What terms and definitions we use?
As used in these Terms, including the preamble hereof, unless expressly otherwise stated or evident in the context, capitalized terms and expressions shall have the meanings as stipulated under this chapter General and Wallet.
2.  How to add Fiat funds to your Account?
2.1. You have two methods to add Fiat funds to your Account:
2.1.1. using the Service of Instant Deposit; and/or
2.1.2. making a transfer from an account opened in your name with a credit or financial institution. The institution must be registered or have its place of businessin a contracting state of the European Economic Area. Subsequent transfers maybe made from a different account provided it is also opened in your name, or by using the Service of Instant Deposit.
2.2. Should you use the Service of Instant Deposit as your initial method of funding your Account, the following restrictions will apply till you have utilised the method outlined in clause 2.1.2:
2.2.1. you will be limited to using the Conversion Services for up to 1000 euros every 30 days, irrespective of the amount of funds you transfer to your Account or have accumulated therein. This restriction applies to the cumulative value of purchases and sales of crypto assets, calculated at the time of the transactions. The 30-day period commences with the first transaction of the Conversion Service;
2.2.2. you will not be able to use any other services provided by Change (i.e. to withdraw or deposit Cryptocurrency, Stake Cryptocurrency, or trade with CFDs); and
2.2.3. you will not be able to withdraw any Fiat funds.
2.3. Even if you choose the method outlined in clause 2.1.2 as your initial payment, you understand and accept that the payment processing may take some time. During this processing period, or if the payment is processed immediately, we reserve the right to enforce the restrictions outlined in clauses 2.2.1-2.2.3 above for a reasonable period following the payment.
2.4. You acknowledge that all of Fiat funds described in these Terms must belong to you, and that all accounts, as well as credit and debit cards used for the Service of Instant Deposit, must be registered in your name.
2.5. We reserve the right to decline accepting Fiat transfers to your account from any account due to any reason or decline transferring funds to an account that wasnot used to make a transfer in accordance with clause 2.1.2 by notifying you there of. We have also reserved the right to decline accepting any payments while using the Service of Instant Deposit, e.g. to prevent fraud or in case more than 3 different cards have been used.
2.6. In case we decline accepting a Fiat transfer, the funds will be immediately returned to your account opened in a credit institution in accordance with the law. However, if you have only used the Service of Instant Deposit, we reserve the right to retain the funds until the completion of the process outlined in clause 2.1.2 above.
2.7. Irrespective of the method you utilize to fund your Account, all fees and limits as stated in the chapter Fees and Limits will apply.
3.  How to withdraw Fiat funds from your Account?
3.1. You are entitled at all times to instruct us to withdraw any Fiat funds from your Account by instructing us to transfer them to an account you previously transferred funds from as described in clause 2.1.2.
3.2.	We reserve the right to decline to perform a withdrawal, if the withdrawal amount is lower than 10 euros.
3.3. In the case of Account closing you must instruct us to transfer all of the Fiat funds to an account you previously transferred funds from as described in clause 2.1.2 and we will transfer it to your account in accordance with the law.
3.4. However, as stated in section 2 above, if you have used only the Service of Instant Deposit to add funds to you Account, we may decline to fulfill your instruction to withdraw until the completion of the process outlined in clause 2.1.2 above. The same applies if your Account is closed by us in accordance with the chapter General and Wallet
4.  How to buy cryptocurrency?
4.1. In order to buy a supported cryptocurrency with the Conversion Rate in exchange for a specified Fiat currency in accordance with these Terms, you must have had transferred the Fiat funds required for the transaction, as shown to you in the Apps or Website, to our account in accordance with clause 2.1.
4.2.	In order to buy a supported cryptocurrency in exchange for another supported cryptocurrency in accordance with these Terms you must have had transferred to us the equivalent amount of supported cryptocurrency, which is to be used in exchange for the requested supported cryptocurrency and will be automatically debited from your Wallet.
4.3.	In order to buy a supported cryptocurrency with the Conversion Rate in exchange for a specified Fiat currency or supported cryptocurrency, but not having transferred the required amount of the specified Fiat currency or supported cryptocurrency to us, the required specified Fiat currency or supported cryptocurrency must be held at your account or Wallet during the time of buying the supported cryptocurrency as a result of using the Conversion Service.
4.4.	In case you have requested to buy a supported cryptocurrency, the amount of supported cryptocurrency bought by you will be transferred to your Wallet after the completion of the relevant transaction.
5.  How to sell cryptocurrency?
5.1. In order to sell a supported cryptocurrency with the Conversion Rate in exchange for a specified Fiat currency in accordance with these Terms, you must have had transferred to us the equivalent amount of supported cryptocurrency, which is to be used in exchange for the requested Fiat currency and will be automatically debited from your Wallet.
5.2.	In case you have requested to sell a supported cryptocurrency in exchange for a specified Fiat currency, the amount of specified Fiat currency will be transferred to your Account after the completion of the relevant transaction specified in your instruction.
6.  How to buy or sell Investment Gold?
6.1. When buying or selling Investment Gold you have acknowledged and agreed with the third-party and cryptocurrency-related risks, and agreed with the relevant PAX Gold Terms and Conditions and any other relevant terms and conditions of Paxos. We shall not assume any liability for any unavailability of redeeming Investment Gold or the existence or termination of PAXG due to reasons not dependent on us, e.g. dependent on the specifics of the Ethereum blockchain or the issuer of PAXG, including but not limited to the sustainability, insolvency, liquidation or bankruptcy of Paxos or any of the service providers or persons connected to the Investment Gold in general.
6.2.	After every resettlement cycle we ensure that the total amount of Investment Gold we hold on behalf of you with our partners, e.g. Payward Inc., matches with the total amount of Investment Gold held on your Account.
6.3.	In order to redeem your Investment Gold into a specific gold bar, held in an London Bullion Market Association-approved security carrier vault, you must pay us exactly 430 PAXG tokens, as well as the Creation & Destruction Fee, and submit a redemption order through the Apps or via email. Please be advised that you are not able to redeem your Investment Gold into Unallocated Gold. If successful, you will receive a confirmation letter through the Apps or via email, confirming the date and time as of which you must collect and accept the delivery of your gold bar in person from our registered address within 2 weeks. For the delivery of the gold bar you are required to verify your identity by providing your valid passport.
6.4.	You may demand for delivery of a substitute thing from us within 2 years as of the date of the delivery, if the gold bar delivered to you does not conform to the contract, e.g. the gold bar does not have the agreed characteristics, does not possess the quality usual for investment gold or is anyway damaged, provided the gold bar has not been removed from its original package and the damage did not occur after the delivery.
7. How are the transactions carried out?
7.1.  We carry out the transactions described in these Terms on the basis of irrevocable instructions from you, which can be submitted through the Apps or Website.
7.2.  You are not allowed to cancel, reverse, or change any transaction marked as complete after the submission of an instruction in accordance with these Terms. We may unilaterally decline to carry out the transaction by notifying you thereof on the Website and/or in the Apps, and return you the relevant instruments, and shall assume no liability for any damages which arise to you as a result thereof. You may only cancel a pending instruction, if you have submitted it by using the services of Limit Order or Stop Order, provided the Rate Reference you set has not been reached and the transaction has not yet marked as complete.
7.3.  You are displayed all supported cryptocurrencies with the estimated Conversion Rate prior to submitting the instructions in accordance with these Terms and/or exact Conversion Rate for transaction(s) marked as complete. By submitting the instructions in accordance with these Terms you irrevocably confirm to carry out the transaction without certainty of the Conversion Rate.
7.4.  After receiving the instructions in accordance with these Terms, we will complete the requested transaction within 5 business days after receiving the payment (whereas a business day is considered to be a day when banks are open for business in Estonia), unless we decline to carry out the transaction in accordance with clause 6.2. We reserve the right to delay any transaction without notifying you thereof, should we perceive a risk of fraud or illegal activity.
7.5. Considering that the prices of cryptocurrencies and Investment Gold are dependent on fluctuations in the financial market, which we have no control over and which may occur within the withdrawal period, in accordance with Law of Obligations Act § 53(4)(1’) you are not entitled to use the right of withdrawal, including in the case of a distance contract.
8.  What are the technical guidelines and regulations that must be adhered to when utilising our Conversion, Wallet and Staking?
8.1.  You are strictly prohibited from attempting to reverse engineer our trading platform or any of the services provided or circumvent any security measures implemented.
8.2. You are not allowed to employ any software, artificial intelligence, ultra-high speed trading strategies, or mass data entry techniques that could manipulate, exploit, abuse, or provide an unfair advantage when using our systems or services.
8.3. It is not permissible to engage in trades that manipulate our systems or services, this includes manipulation of service fees and hedging.
8.4. It is strictly forbidden to act in an unfair, abusive, manipulative, or illegal manner when utilizing our services. This includes engaging in scalping or any other form of unethical trading practices.
8.5. Engaging in trades or other services with the intention of exploiting price errors is not permitted.
8.6. Engaging in trades or other services with the intention of exploiting system bugs or errors is not permitted. If such circumstance is detected in the course of trading or the use of other services, you are obliged to notify immediately about the issue bugbounty@changeinvest.com.
8.7. Your orders must comply with the rules and regulations of the exchange. Your orders must not be intended to defraud or manipulate the market.
8.8. If you generate profits by violating any of the above rules or your activity results in damage for xChange AS, we reserve the right to withhold assets on your account and we may deduct the amount from your account balances unilaterally, in case of which, we will provide full overview of the circumstances under which the activity takes place. Should assets be withdrawn from your account prior to the detection of any violation, you hereby consent to immediately reimburse all damages resulting from your activities upon receipt of the claim. Additionally, you agree to bear the costs associated with legal fees or similar expenses incurred in pursuing legal action if you fail to comply or refuse to cooperate in resolving the aforementioned claim.
8.9. Any breaches of the aforementioned rules will be documented. We may cancel your orders, freeze, block, and/or terminate our services, your account, and/or our agreement with you in response to such breaches. While we may provide notice in accordance with applicable laws, it is not mandatory for us to do so.
9.	What are your liabilities?
9.1.	Should you breach any obligations described in these Terms, we have the right to refuse to carry out the requested transactions by notifying you thereof on the Website and/or in the Apps, and we shall assume no liability for any damages which arise to you as a result thereof.
9.2.	We cannot guarantee and are not liable for the availability of the Conversion Service or the buying or selling of Investment Gold, and the act of buying supported cryptocurrency is not and may not be considered a guarantee from us that you could sell the cryptocurrencies or Fiat currencies obtained using the Conversion Service back to us nor with the set Rate Reference, while using the services of Limit Order or Stop Order.
In force from 2024-12-17
Staking
This chapter sets the terms and conditions for using Staking - cryptocurrency services, which allows you to earn rewards on the supported cryptocurrencies held on your Account. By using the Conversion Service and buying the supported cryptocurrencies as described below, you have agreed to the use of and the terms and conditions of the services. Please be advised that the Staking service described in this chapter is not addressed to and may not be used by Users, who are located in or nationals or residents of specific territories, where such a service is not allowed, including any Restricted Jurisdiction.
1. How Staking works?
1.1.	While using Staking you have to use the Conversion Service, whereby you buy the supported cryptocurrencies, which are shown to you in the Apps, from us, in exchange for specified Fiat currencies or other supported cryptocurrencies, and vice versa. You are entitled to at all times buy specified Fiat currencies or other supported cryptocurrencies from us, in exchange for the supported cryptocurrencies, however in these instances you may not be eligible for the reward.
1.2.	After having bought the supported cryptocurrencies, with Staking all your supported cryptocurrencies may be deposited on your behalf to our Kraken Account, including for the use of services such as On-Chain Staking Services and/or Off-chain Staking Program, operated by third-party custodian, i.e. Payward Trading Ltd and/or BitGo, Inc. and/or our Ledger Vault, whereby access is provided to third-party service "non-custodial validation-as-a-service" providers that facilitate the management of staking processes without taking custody of the cryptocurrencies.
1.3. Interest for the specific calendar day (T) is calculated on a daily basis on the outstanding balance of the supported cryptocurrencies held on your Account at the beginning of the next calendar day (00:00 UTC; T+1), and rewarded shortly after but not later than the end of the day in the same supported cryptocurrency. The expected as well as the exact size and rate of the Staking reward at a specific time is shown to you in the Apps, which in turn is also subject to Staking in accordance with these terms and conditions. For absolute clarity, you are not entitled for a reward for the supported cryptocurrencies or any parts of it at a specific day (T), which were not held on your Account at the moment of the calculation (T+1), including whenever you have submitted a Stop Order or a Limit Order with the supported cryptocurrency.
1.4. For protocols with activation and deactivation periods, we reserve the right to pass rewards on to Users accounts at our discretion. This means for certain cryptocurrencies, the first reward is not distributed the next day, instead being subject to the activation period specified in the App after which regular reward distribution as stated in clause 1.3 will start. This also means that for days prior to the activation period no rewards are earned by the user.
1.5. All fees, including network fees for the aforementioned transfers, have already been deducted from the interest offered.
2. What are the risks?
2.1. Since Staking is in its entirety cryptocurrency services, your supported cryptocurrencies are not subject to statutory or voluntary deposit guarantee schemes or deposit insurance.
2.2. By using Staking you acknowledge that various types of risks are involved, including but not limited to risks relating to the changes in the operating rules or other features, e.g. the existence, availability, sustainability of or forks in the specific protocol or blockchain, or the fluctuation of the value or the existence of any supported cryptocurrencies, including where relevant the fiat currency it is pegged to, counterparty risks, including but not limited to the sustainability, insolvency, liquidation and bankruptcy of one of our partners and their partners, regulatory risks and uncertainties. Should any of the risks realise, you hereby understand and consent that you are solely liable for the consequences, and we shall not assume any liability nor obligations thereof.
2.3. By using Staking you understand and agree that rewarding you with the interest is in our sole discretion, not an obligation, and it is not a guarantee that you will receive the reward as a whole or any parts of it, or by the due date. We have reserved the right to from time to time change the interest rate, which is shown to you in the Apps, and these terms, and temporarily or permanently terminate or discontinue providing the service of Staking at any time, without giving you a prior notice thereof. Should we temporarily or permanently terminate or discontinue the Staking service, you will no longer be eligible for any rewards. Interest calculation will cease as of that calendar day, and we will not be obligated to provide any Staking rewards for the calendar day on which the service was terminated or discontinued.
2.4. Please be advised that Staking, especially the Off-chain Staking Program, is not addressed to and may not be used by Users, who are not treated as Eligible participants, including are located in or nationals or residents of: (i) any Restricted Location; (ii) Australia, Canada, Denmark, Finland, France, Germany, Hong Kong, Italy, Japan, Luxembourg, the Netherlands, Singapore, Sweden, the United Arab Emirates, the United Kingdom or the United States; (iii) any jurisdiction where the Off-chain Staking Program is not legally authorized; or (iv) any jurisdiction where the use of the Off-chain Staking Program would be illegal or otherwise violate any applicable laws or regulations of that jurisdiction.
2.5. In addition to agreeing to these terms, when using Staking you also consent and agree to abide by the terms of our partners. Please also pay extra attention to the risk disclosure sections. Relevant documents are available at
https://www.bitgo.com/legal/terms-of-use/
,  and
https://www.kraken.com/legal
.
3. How is the security of the supported cryptocurrencies ensured?
3.1.	Change has performed and is constantly re-performing relevant due diligence on its partners and the financial, reputational and regulatory risks surrounding them. If it becomes known or Change deems the counterparty risk, including any security risk to your supported cryptocurrencies, to be unacceptable, we will immediately terminate the partnership and/or the service, and inform you thereof in the Apps.
3.2. In terms of Staking, despite cryptocurrency exchanges not qualifying for deposit insurance programs, because exchanges are not savings institutions, your cryptocurrencies deposited on Kraken Account are subject to a semi-annual advanced cryptographic accounting procedure conducted by trusted and independent third-party auditors, so-called Proof of Reserves audits, to ensure that the balance of the supported cryptocurrencies is backed by real assets.
In force from 2023-02-22
CFD Trading
These Terms & Conditions apply to CFD Trading service and your Margin Account. Please read them carefully. You can access and download a copy of these Terms & Conditions at any time from
www.changeinvest.com
.
These are specific terms that will apply to you when you trade CFDs directly with Change Securities B.V. using Change Apps. The following terms apply to you in addition but not limited to the chapter
General and Wallet
, which apply to all of our services and not just to CFD Trading. Capitalised words have the same meaning which are given to those words in the
General and Wallet
chapter or in any other chapter in this regard. In the event of any discrepancies between the terms of CFD Trading and
General and Wallet
or other terms of Change, these terms of CFD Trading chapter shall prevail.
Citizens or residents of and persons located in Afghanistan, Algeria, American Samoa, Barbados, Belarus, Burkina Faso, Cambodia, Cayman Islands, China, Congo, Democratic Republic of the, Côte d’Ivoire, Cuba, Egypt, Guam, Haiti, Hong Kong, Islamic Republic of Iran, Iraq, Jamaica, Jordan, Democratic People’s Republic of Korea, Lebanon, Libya, Macao, Mali, Morocco, Mozambique, Myanmar, Nicaragua, Niger, Nigeria, Northern Mariana Islands, Pakistan, Palestine, Panama, Philippines, Puerto Rico, Russian Federation, Saudi Arabia, Senegal, Somalia, South Sudan, Sudan, Syrian Arab Republic, Trinidad and Tobago, Tunisia, Uganda, United Arab Emirates, United States Minor Outlying Islands, United States of America, Uzbekistan, Vanuatu, Virgin Islands (U.S.), Western Sahara, Yemen, Zimbabwe are prohibited from using the service of CFD Trading. The country list above shall not be treated as exhaustive, and we reserve the right to at all times at its own discretion decline to provide the services above to any person, who is a citizen or a resident of or located in a country, which we unilaterally deem as having an unacceptable risk, and amend the list without giving a prior notification thereof.
Any marketing or informational content published about the CFD Trading service, or distribution thereof, is not addressed to the Belgian public.
In these Terms & Conditions:
“Apps”
mean the web, Android and iOS mobile apps of Change, which give access to the Services;
“Change”
means third party xChange AS, an Estonian public limited company registered under registry code 14428150, Rävala pst 4, 10143 Tallinn to whom Change Securities B.V. has outsourced certain activities to comply with requirements included in the Dutch
Wet ter voorkoming van witwassen en financieren van terrorisme and the Santiewet 1977
, namely the application of due diligence measures, identification of politically exposed persons and customer data retention, but also customer support;
“You”
means the named account holder being the authorised user of CFD Trading and owner of the Margin Account and Open CFD Positions;
“We”
,
“us”
or
“our”
means Change Securities B.V. (Chamber of Commerce no. 50755854, previously Optieclub.nl B.V.), Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands, who provides CFD Trading service on a cross-border basis and is authorised and regulated by the Dutch Authority for the Financial Markets (AFM).
If you have any questions you can contact us by:
email:
support@changeinvest.com
;
mobile application: log in to the App and send us a secure message; or
post: Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands.
All of the terms and definitions not stipulated in these Terms & Conditions are stipulated in the
General and Wallet
chapter.
1. What is CFD trading and how it works?
1.1. A contract for difference (“CFD”) is a financial product which allows you to trade on the price movements of an underlying product for example shares, forex, indices, commodities, or cryptoassets. When you trade a CFD, you are agreeing to exchange the difference in the price of an underlying product from the point in time when your position is opened to when it is closed.
1.2. We may act as principal or on a matched principal basis when providing you with the CFD Trading services. This means we will be the counterparty to your trades.
1.3.	Where you buy and sell complex products, such as CFDs, we are required to assess the appropriateness of the product by taking into account your trading knowledge and experience by conducting the Appropriateness Assessment.
1.4. If we have assessed that the CFD Trading is not appropriate for you, we will either:
1.4.1. provide you with an appropriate warning, after which you may decide to continue at your own risk; or
1.4.2. refrain from enabling the CFD Trading functionality on your Account, so that you will not be able to trade using the Apps.
1.5. We allow you to trade CFDs using Margin Trading. This means you can make money quickly, but you can also lose money quickly. You can find out more about what Margin Trading and leverage are, the risks of trading CFDs, and the risks of leverage in section 3 and 5, the
General Risk Disclosure
, and on the Website.
1.6.	If you are a retail client, we will make sure that your Open CFD Position will get closed when the unrealised net profit of that Open CFD Position falls to less than half of the initial margin.
1.7.	If you are a retail client, we will make sure you do not lose more money than what you have deposited on your Margin Account.
2.	What are the limitations to CFD Trading?
2.1. When you trade a CFD, you will have an economic exposure to the underlying product of the CFD, but you will not have legal ownership of any underlying products. For example, if you trade a CFD over shares, you will not have the rights which legal owners have, such as voting rights or rights to dividends. However, we may carry out adjustments if such a Market Event occurs. Please refer to section 13 of these terms for more information on a Market Event.
3. What are the key risks of CFD Trading?
3.1. CFDs are complex derivative products and come with a high risk of losing money quickly due to leverage. Trading with leverage magnifies your gains and losses, so small price changes in the underlying product can result in large losses or gains. It is therefore possible that you may lose more than your deposit in a specific trade. Please refer to section 5 of these terms for more information on Margin Trading.
3.2. The underlying assets of CFDs are often made up of equities, foreign exchange, commodities, cryptoassets and similar products. The markets of these products can be volatile, which means the prices of the products can change rapidly, and therefore may be unpredictable.
3.3. You should only trade CFDs if all of the following applies:
3.3.1. you have sufficient and relevant knowledge about or experience in, trading in volatile markets;
3.3.2. you have time to manage your Open CFD Positions on an active basis;
3.3.3. you fully understand how CFDs work (including all associated risks and costs), are aware that Margin Trading creates greater risks;
3.3.4. you understand that there are situations where we are allowed to close out your Open CFD Positions without giving you any notice;
3.3.5. you are trading with money you can afford to lose;
3.3.6. you have a high-risk tolerance; and
3.3.7. you want to gain short term financial exposure to a product.
3.4. You should ensure you fully understand the risks involved before using our Services and, if required, take appropriate investment, financial, legal, tax and other necessary professional, independent advice. More information on the risks associated with trading CFDs is set out in our General Risk Disclosure. You should read this document and fully understand the risks before accepting these Terms & Conditions.
4. How is your money protected?
4.1. Money that you have transferred to your Margin Account, i.e. the deposit is held by an independent foundation named Stichting Cliëntengelden Optionclub which keeps liquid assets equal to all balances of Margin Accounts. This means it is always guaranteed that all balances of Margin Accounts can be paid out.
4.2. We are covered by the Dutch
investor compensation scheme
(ICS) operated by the Dutch central bank. If we fail, the scheme guarantees that you will receive back your money deposited on the Margin Account up to € 20,000 or as may be updated from time to time.
4.3. Importantly, the protection is only applicable to regulated products i.e. CFD Trading. This means that any cryptoasset related Service is not protected.
4.4. Claims ensuing from investment losses suffered from CFD Trading are not eligible for compensation.
5. How Margin Trading works?
5.1. We allow you to trade CFDs using leverage. Leverage is a form of borrowing which allows you to deposit only a part of the cost of your transaction upfront. This deposit is called “margin” and is used by us as security against any potential losses you may incur. The more leverage you use, the less margin you need. Money being used as margin cannot be transferred out of your Margin Account.
5.2.	Different amounts of leverage, i.e. margin requirements apply to different underlying products. Applicable law sets maximum leverage amounts, but we can decrease the leverage we offer at any time. The amount of leverage which you can access at a particular point in time can be viewed on the Website or in the Apps.
5.3.	If you are a retail client, we are required by law to limit the amount of leverage that you can apply to certain transactions and set a minimum margin requirement. Professional clients will not be subject to these restrictions. The nature of these restrictions will depend on where you are a resident, and are likely to vary depending on the underlying product that you are trading. Where transactions were executed with a leverage or margin that is no longer permitted in the country where you live, we may close any or all of your Open CFD Positions without further notice to you and we may also close your Account. You acknowledge that this may result in a profit or a loss to you.
5.4.	We will calculate your margin on a position by position basis. The money available as margin on a position, cannot equal less than 50% of the money that you might lose on that Open CFD Position at any time. If you do not have enough margin available, we may require additional margin to secure your trades. The amount of money that you must have available as a margin can be viewed on the Website or in the Apps.
5.5.	It is your responsibility to monitor the money in your Margin Account against your potential losses, the margin required, and whether your position is close to your stop level, as we will not notify you when this happens. If you do not have enough money in your Margin Account to meet the margin requirement on a certain position, you should do the following:
5.5.1.	close any or all of your Open CFD Positions to stop losing more money;
5.5.2.	partially close any or all of your Open CFD Positions; and/or
5.5.3.	adjust your stop levels, but please note, that the ability to adjust your stop levels is subject to you having the appropriate amount of money on your Margin Account.
5.6.	Unless you carry out one or more of the steps listed in clause 5.5, your Open CFD Position will be closed irrespective of the total amount of money available on your Margin Account or the performance and balance of your other Open CFD Positions.
5.7.	We may change our margin requirements i.e. leverage multipliers at any time, at our sole discretion, including in order to comply with the applicable law. One margin demand does not preclude another. Any amount needed to meet the new requirements must be satisfied in the currency we specify. The adjustment should be made immediately unless we specify a future date and/or time by which the adjustment must be made.
6. How can you place an order?
6.1.	An order is any instruction given or request placed by you with us to purchase or to sell or otherwise deal in financial products, which may include a limit order, stop loss order and/or take profit order or such other order as may be available on the trading platform from time to time. We will then need to accept your order for it to take effect. Please read section 7 which explains when you might be able to change or cancel your order, as well as when we might not accept your order or cancel your order when using CFD Trading service.
6.2.	You can place an order by using the Apps. Generally we do not accept orders over the phone, but may do so at our discretion.
6.3.	We will execute orders that are received from your Account, and which we reasonably believe are from you, or authorised by you. Please be careful when placing an order. If you place orders by accident or in error, for example if you place multiple orders which are the same, we will assume that you did this on purpose and we will execute them without checking this with you.
6.4.	Once we accept your order, we will execute it in accordance with any specific instructions that you give. This is called a trade. For more information on how you can place an order, the instructions that you can give, and how we may execute your order, please read our Best Execution Policy.
6.5.	We cannot guarantee that your execution price will match your order price, including where you've placed a limit order, take profit and/or stop loss order. This is because the market may be volatile and/or the price may have moved up or down between the time that you place your order (or the time your limit order, take profit and/or stop loss order has been activated) and the time that we execute your order. This is known as slippage. When this happens, we will execute your order at the next best price and in accordance with our Best Execution Policy.
6.6.	If you have placed an order during the condition stipulated in the following sub-clauses then the applicable order you have placed will be executed as soon as is reasonable under the circumstances when trading resumes. We do not guarantee that your order will be executed at the first available underlying market price at commencement of trading or within any specific range compared to other market prices which may be available to you from other sources. We are not liable for any loss or for other claims which you may have in connection with such orders. The conditions can be the following:
6.6.1.	times in which the market of the underlying is suspended (for example, during the weekend or at off-market hours, suspension due to market conditions or due to any other event in which the market of the underlying is suspended); and/or
6.6.2.	during the time the market was open, however, your order is triggered shortly following a suspension.
6.7.	We will execute orders received during trading hours. Different products have different trading hours and these are available on the Website. It is your responsibility to ensure you are aware of the trading hours for the product you are trading. We may agree to execute orders outside of business hours, at our discretion.
6.8.	Where you place an order outside of market hours, or where the product you are trading has a 24/7 market, but your order is placed during a period where there is limited trading (for example during the weekend), the availability of the different functionalities which we may provide as part of CFD Trading, including instructions which you may give in respect of a trade, may be delayed or may not be available. We are not liable for any loss which results from your inability to access or provide certain trading functionalities and instructions.
7. How can you manage your placed order?
7.1.	You may request to cancel or modify an order which we have not executed. However, we cannot guarantee that we will be able to carry out your request. This will depend on the product that you are trading.
8. In what circumstances we may not accept an order?
8.1.	We are not required to accept every order that you place and have reserved the right to decline any order or transaction. Even if we have accepted your order we are not required to execute it. The following is a non-exhaustive list of examples of situations where we may not accept an order, not execute or complete an order, or cancel an order:
8.1.1. we reasonably believe that the security of the App or your Account, including Margin Account is at risk, or if we're concerned about unauthorised or fraudulent use of your Account. This might happen if we think someone is using your Account without your permission;
8.1.2. you do not have enough money in your Margin Account to cover the maximum amount of loss associated with your order, plus any associated fees, charges and applicable margin;
8.1.3. we have a good reason to believe that there is an error with your order. For example, if you have placed an order that is unusually large and you have never done this before;
8.1.4. the order you have requested is unusual or for exaggerated volumes;
8.1.5. there is an error with the quote that we have provided. For example, if the quote is manifestly different from the market price, prices on exchanges, prices on other trading platforms, and/or if the quote lacks economical sense;
8.1.6. there is a change in the applicable law, which means that the order is no longer in compliance with the law;
8.1.7. there is a Market Event;
8.1.8. an exchange requests or recommends that the order is cancelled;
8.1.9. you breach the rules of trading;
8.1.10. an event of default occurs; or
8.1.11. an exceptional event occurs.
8.2.	If we do not accept your order, execute your order, or cancel your order, we will inform you by making that information available in the Apps, unless there is a legal reason that we cannot provide this information to you. If we charged you a fee as part of the order, we will refund that money back into your Margin Account. If there were no fees or charges, then you will not receive a refund.
8.3.	If we have executed your order, and therefore a transaction has occurred, we may take corrective actions and either modify the transaction, or void the transaction, under the scenarios listed in clause 8.1 above. We will inform you of errors by making information available on our trading platform, including any corrective actions we intend to take.
8.4.	We will not be responsible for any losses you incur as a result of any actions or inactions taken by us in accordance with this section 8.
9. On what terms will my trades execute?
9.1.	We are required to take sufficient steps to achieve the best possible result for you, on a consistent basis, when providing CFD Trading. Our
Best Execution Policy
sets out the procedures that we follow as well as the relevant market factors that we take into account as part of our best execution obligation. This policy, which may be amended from time to time, forms part of our agreement with you and is available on our Website.
9.2.	We understand that the best execution result is one that produces the best possible financial result for you, and that the “best possible financial result” is the best possible result in combination across all your trades. This means that some trades, taken individually, may be less favourable. Where we reasonably believe that it is in the overall best interest of all our clients, we may combine your order with our own orders or those of other customers, or we may split your orders. Best interests are not solely determined by price, and we also consider other factors, such as the speed of the trade and the likelihood of the trade being successful, to be important. Aggregation or splitting of orders may result in you obtaining, on some occasions, more favourable terms or price, and, on other occasions, less favourable terms or price than if your order had been executed separately.
9.3.	We monitor the effectiveness of our Best Execution Policy on a regular basis to ensure that we consistently achieve the best results for you.
10.	When can your Open CFD Positions get automatically closed?
10.1.	We may close your Open CFD Position where our system or you have placed a stop-loss order and the stop price has been reached.
10.2.	We may decline or cancel your order and close your Open CFD Position where you do not have the required margin in your Margin Account or you do not meet the margin requirements, as described in section 5 above. We may do this without further notice to you, and you may make a profit or a loss as a result.
10.3.	We may also close your orders in special circumstances or when a Market Event occurs as described in section 13 below.
10.4.	Please refer to section 8 above for more information about our rights and your rights in special circumstances.
11.	How can you see your orders and trades?
11.1.	Information about your trading activities, which includes records of the trades that you've concluded, your Open CFD Positions, margin, balances as well as other information about your trades and orders, is available online in your Account. Your Account will be updated no later than 24 hours after any activity takes place. You will be able to filter this information in different ways, for example on a per month basis. We are under no obligation to provide this information in hard copy or by email, but we may do so upon your request.
11.2.	If you think there is a problem with your Account, please contact us as soon as possible and not later than 48 hours following the day on which the information became available. Otherwise, the information will be conclusive evidence of your transactions, concluded trades, your Open CFD Positions, margin, and balances.
12.	What are the rules of trading?
12.1.	There are rules which you need to follow when using our CFD Trading service. These are:
12.1.1.	you must not reverse engineer or avoid any security measures on the trading platform;
12.1.2.	you must not use any software, artificial intelligence, ultra-high speed, or mass data entry which might manipulate, game, abuse, or give you an unfair advantage when using our systems or Services;
12.1.3.	you will not enter into trades which manipulate our systems or Services, for example entering into a buy trade as well as a sell trade, for the same or for a similar product, at the same or similar time;
12.1.4.	you will not enter into transactions or combinations of transactions such as holding long and short positions in the same or similar instruments at similar times either by you or by you acting in concert with others, which, taken together or separately, are for the purpose of manipulating our systems or Services for gain;
12.1.5.	you will not act in an unfair, abusive, manipulative, or illegal way when using our Services, for example scalping;
12.1.6.	you will not enter into trades aimed at exploiting errors in prices and/or conclude trades at off-market prices; and
12.1.7.	your order must not violate exchange rules or securities or commodities laws, regulations or rules, and/or be intended to defraud or manipulate the market.
12.2.	If you make money by breaching the above rules, we may not pay that money to you or, if we have paid that money, we may deduct it from any of the balances of your Account.
12.3.	If you breach any of the above rules we will record such breach. We may also cancel your orders, freeze, block and/or terminate our Services, your Account, and/or our agreement with you. We may, but are not required to, give you notice of this, subject to the applicable law.
13.	What are Market Events?
13.1.	There are various types of events that affect the trading of specific products resulting in for example higher price volatility, higher trading activity or changes related to the structure of a given product. Most of the latter can be categorised as corporate events which will result in a change to the financial instruments. Examples of corporate events include share consolidations, share splits, reorganisations, mergers, take-over offers (and similar), name changes and rebranding, dividend distributions, and delistings.
13.2.	If a Market Event impacts the underlying product of a CFD, we will use reasonable endeavours to adjust all Open CFD Positions on that instrument, in a fair way and in accordance with market practice, and/or taking into account the treatment we may receive from our counterparties or any relevant third party and the deduction of any taxes applicable. The adjustments we carry out will depend on the circumstances of each event, and is according to our sole discretion, however we are not obliged to do this. Adjustments may include changing the price or the quantity of CFDs that you have to reflect the economic rights that you had prior to the Market Event occurring.
13.3.	If an issuer of an underlying product goes into insolvency or is dissolved, we will close any Open CFD Positions related to that product. The closing date shall be the date of insolvency. Any money from the sale will be paid into your Margin Account. If you lose money as a result of the sale, we are not responsible for this.
13.4. We reserve the rights to close out any Open CFD Positions at the market price immediately prior to the Market Event taking place.
14. What are the possible conflicts of interest?
14.1. We are required to act in your best interest when providing our Services. However, there may be instances where your interests conflict with our interests, or with another customer's interests. For example:
14.1.1. we may execute hedging transactions before or after entering into a transaction with you to manage our risk in relation to the transaction, which may impact the price you pay or receive for such transactions, and we will retain any profits generated by such hedging. However, we are not required to hedge transactions if we do not want to;
14.1.2. we may enter into arrangements with third parties, or with other customers, where we make payments to them or receive payments from them based on your trading activity or volume, where such arrangements are permitted by the applicable law. These payments may include rebates, commissions, widened spreads and profit sharing;
14.1.3. we may provide, pay or receive fees, commissions or non-monetary benefits where such payments are permitted by the applicable law;
14.1.4. we may share dealing charges with our affiliate companies or receive remuneration from them in respect of transactions carried out on your behalf;
14.1.5. we may be the counterparty to trades that you enter into; and
14.1.6. we are responsible for setting the price of instruments and products which can be traded in the Apps. This means that our prices can be different from the prices provided by other brokers and the market price, as well as the current prices on any exchanges or trading platforms.
14.2. We have in place a number of internal policies and arrangements to help manage any conflicts. In addition, the potential conflicts related to trading detailed above are subject to an objective criteria which is set out in our
Best Execution Policy
.
15. How we may contact you?
15.1. You expressly consent to us using the Apps or Website, as we deem appropriate, to inform you of information about us and of changes to such information (including changes to Terms and Conditions and our Best Execution Policy).
15.2. We may also communicate with you via Apps and Website, by email, telephone, post, newsletter, letter, electronic chats, and/or any other means of communication. We will use the contact details you gave us when you opened your Account, and as updated by you to us.
15.3. If your details change, including your email address, contact numbers, name, home address, country of residence or nationality, you must tell us as soon as possible. If you do not let us know, you might not receive important information from us.
15.4. Our Terms and Conditions, i.e. our agreement with you, and all information, statements and notifications between you and us, will be in English and we will communicate in English. If we provide you with documents in another language, and there is an inconsistency, the English version will prevail.
16.	How can you make a complaint regarding CFD Trading?
16.1. If you are unhappy with a Service or something has gone wrong, please contact us so we can investigate the circumstances for you and we will try to put it right. You may contact us using any of the following means:
16.1.1. email to
support@changeinvest.com
;
16.1.2. log in to the Apps and send us a secure message; or
16.1.3. send a letter to Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands.
16.2. We will make every possible effort to address all points of complaint by email. We will respond within 5 business days upon receiving the complaint. If a full response cannot be provided within these timeframes, we will send a holding reply with a full response to follow within 20 business days.
16.3. If you want to know more about how we handle customer complaints, please read our
Complaints Handling Procedure
.
16.4. If you're still not happy with how we've dealt with your complaint, you can refer it to the Dutch
Financial Services Complaints Tribunal
(Kifid) using our registration number 400.000422. The Kifid consists of the Financial Services Ombudsman and the Financial Services Disputes Committee.
16.5. Ultimately you may turn to the Dutch
Authority for the Financial Markets
(AFM) or to relevant courts. For more information on such alternative solutions, please refer to the Website.
17. Will these terms ever change?
17.1. We may change these Terms & Conditions by notifying you by e-mail or other agreed means at least one month before the change is due to happen. We will assume that you agree with the change. If you do not agree with the change you must tell us before the change happens and we will cancel your account immediately. If your account is cancelled or you cancel your account in this way, we will return any balance on the account to you.
17.2. An up-to-date version of these Terms & Conditions, as well as any notices of future changes will always be available on the Website. You should check it regularly for such notices and changes.
18. Can I assign my rights or obligations under these terms?
18.1. You may not transfer or assign any rights or obligations you may have under these Terms & Conditions to any other person without our prior written consent. We may assign the benefit and burden of these Terms & Conditions to any other person at any time on giving you two months prior notice of this. If we do this, your rights will not be affected.
19. What is the governing law?
19.1. This agreement is concluded in English. All communications with you will be in English. These Terms & Conditions are governed by Dutch law and all disputes shall be solved by a way of negotiations, or if the Parties fail to do so in respective Dutch courts.
20. What are the fees and limits?
20.1. We will charge you a fee for each order we execute for you. This is called a spread. A spread is the difference in the sell and the buy price. The spread is different for each type of product and Service and can be found in the Apps and on the Website.
20.2. We will estimate the total amount of spread that applies each time you place an order. We cannot provide you with an exact amount because the spread may change between the time you make an order, and the time we execute your order.
20.3. The spreads which we charge can change due to market conditions. For example, there may be instances when market conditions cause spreads to widen beyond the typical spreads displayed on our website and/or platform.
20.4. All the information is available in chapter
Fees and Limits
. However, for specific Services, other fees may also apply. For example, if you trade CFDs, we also charge you an overnight fee. We may update our commissions, charges, fees and costs from time to time. It is your responsibility to keep up to date with any changes, and to be aware of the commissions, charges, fees and costs that apply to your trades and the Services that you use.
20.5. You acknowledge that all amounts due to us shall be deducted from any of the balances of your Account.
21. What are the effects of terminating the CFD Trading service and closing the Account?
21.1. When you terminate your relationship with us and provide us with instructions for closing your Account, we will arrange for your Open CFD Positions to be closed as soon as reasonably possible in accordance with these Terms & Conditions. Where securities are sold, you may suffer a shortfall between the amount you invested and the amount you get back after sale. We are not responsible for any shortfall that arises. Any shortfall will be borne by you.
21.2. We will hold all the proceeds as client money and we will charge fees and any other applicable charges and taxes from that money.
21.3. We are required to keep your records for at least five years after your Account is closed. This period may be extended by the applicable law or agreement between you and us in writing. These records will be our sole property.
In force from 2024-08-08
Best Execution Policy
This is a specific policy that will apply when you use CFD Trading Service i.e. trade CFDs directly with Change Securities B.V. using Change Apps. In this procedure:
“Apps”
mean the web, Android and iOS mobile apps of Change, which give access to the Services;
“Change”
means third party xChange AS, an Estonian public limited company registered under registry code 14428150, Rävala pst 4, 10143 Tallinn to whom Change Securities B.V. relies on to comply with requirements included in the Dutch
Wet ter voorkoming van witwassen en financieren van terrorisme and the Santiewet 1977
, namely the application of due diligence measures, identification of politically exposed persons and customer data retention, but also customer support;
“Company”
means Change Securities B.V (Chamber of Commerce no. 50755854, previously Optieclub.nl B.V.), Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands, who provides CFD Trading service on a cross-border basis and is authorised and regulated by the Dutch Authority for the Financial Markets (AFM);
“
Customer
” or “
you
” means the named natural person account holder, who has read, agreed with and accepted all the Terms and Conditions, being the authorised user of CFD Trading and owner of the Margin Account and Open CFD Positions.
1. Introduction
The Best Execution Policy (hereinafter "the Policy" is provided to the Client in accordance with the Provisions of Investment Services, the Exercise of Investment Activities, the Operation of Regulated Markets and Other Related Markets Laws supervised by The European Securities and Markets Authority (ESMA) and Netherlands Authority for the Financial Markets (AFM), (hereinafter "the Law"). Pursuant to the Law, the Company is required to take all sufficient steps to obtain the best possible result on behalf of its Clients when providing to them the Investment Services that the Company is licensed to provide. The Client acknowledges that by opening a Margin Account with the Company his orders will be executed Over-the-Counter ("OTC"). That means that Client orders will be executed outside Regulated Markets and/or Multilateral Trading Facilities.
2. Client Categorization and Order Execution
The Company is authorised to execute orders on Clients’ behalf. The present policy applies only to Retail Clients, it does not apply to Eligible Counterparties and Professional clients.
3. Best Execution Factors and Criteria
The Company takes all sufficient steps to act in the best interest of its Customers when executing Customer’s Orders and obtain the best possible result for Customers taking into account the following factors when dealing with Customers Orders: price, cost, speed, likelihood of execution and settlement, size, market impact or any other consideration relevant to the execution of an order. The Company does not consider the above list exhaustive and the order in which the above factors are presented shall not be taken as priority factor. The Company when executing Clients’ Orders is required under the relevant regulatory framework to assign a relative importance on the following execution factors:
a. Price:
For any given CFD, the Company will quote two prices: the higher price (ASK) at which the Client can buy (go long) that CFD, and the lower price (BID) at which the Client can sell (go short) that CFD. Collectively, the ASK and BID prices are referred to as the Company’s price. The difference between the lower and the higher price of a given CFD is the spread. Such orders as Buy Limit and Stop Loss, Take profit for opened short position are executed at ASK price. Such orders as Sell Limit and Stop Loss, Take profit for opened long position are executed at BID price. The Company’s price for a given CFD is calculated by reference to the price of the relevant underlying asset, which the Company obtains from third party external reference sources. The Company’s prices can be found on the Company’s website and/or trading platforms. The Company updates its prices as frequently as the limitations of technology and communications links allow. The Company reviews its third party external reference sources in frequent periods to ensure that the data obtained continues to remain competitive.
b. Costs:
For opening a position in some types of CFDs the Client may be required to pay a mark-up on spread and an overnight financing fee (“swap”) if the Client wished to hold his position overnight. The amount of the costs is disclosed on the Company's website and/or trading platforms. Commissions may be charged either in the form of a percentage of the overall value of the trade or as fixed amounts. In the case of financing fees, the value of opened positions in some types of CFDs is increased or reduced by a daily financing fee “swap rate” throughout the life of the contract. Financing fees are based on prevailing market interest rates, which may vary over time. Details of daily financing fees applied are available on the Company’s website and/or trading platforms. For all types of CFDs that the Company offers, the commission and financing fees are not incorporated into the Company’s quoted price and are instead charged explicitly to the Client account.
c. Speed of Execution:
The Company places a significant importance when executing Client’s Orders and strives to offer high speed of execution within the limitations of technology and communication links. In case where the Clients use a wireless connection or a dial up connection or any other communication link that can cause a poor internet connection, which can cause unstable connectivity with the Company's trading platform, resulting to the Client placing his orders at a delay and the orders being executed at a better or worse prevailing price offered, the Company does not accept any liability in case of such incident.
d. Likelihood of Execution:
There would be cases where it may not be possible to arrange the order for execution. That is because we rely on third-party LPs for prices and available volume. Therefore, the execution of Clients’ orders will depend on whether there are prices and liquidity available at the time these orders are received. The availability on execution may be subject to variation, especially during abnormal market conditions, such as:
During market opening times
During times of market news and events
During periods of significant volatility
Where there is a rapid price movement
Where there is insufficient liquidity for the execution of the specific volume at the declared price or a force majeure event has occurred.
Where the Company’s Internal Risk Limits no longer permit the acceptance of any further orders on a specific instrument.
e. Likelihood of settlement:
The CFDs offered by the Company do not involve the delivery of the underlying asset, so there is no settlement as there would be for example if the Customer had bought shares.
f. Size of Order:
The minimum size of an order may be different for each asset type and/ or financial instrument. A Lot is a unit for measuring the transaction amount and is different for each type of Financial Instrument. Please refer to the website and/or platform for the value of minimum size of an order or minimum Lot for a given CFD type.
The Client’s orders are executed at the “BID”/ “ASK” prices offered by the Company and which the Client can see in the Electronic Trading Platform. The Client places his/her order at the prices he/she sees on his/her Client terminal and the execution process is initiated. Normally the transaction is executed at the prices the Client can see on his/her Client terminal. Due to the high volatility of the markets as well as the internet connectivity between the Client terminal and the server, the prices requested by the Client and the current market price may change, during the confirmation process. In this event, the Company has the right to decline the Client’s requested price and offer a new price. The Client can either accept the new price and execute the transaction or refuse the new price, thus cancelling the execution of the transaction.
All orders are placed in lot sizes. A lot is a unit measuring the transaction amount and it is different for each type of Instrument as set out on the Company’s Trading Platform and website and updated from to time. Details of the lot sizes for a given Financial Instrument type are available in the Company’s Trading Platform and website and Clients acknowledge that it is their responsibility to review the said details and become familiar with. Clients further acknowledge Terms and Conditions and accept that even though in some cases there is no maximum size of an order which the Client can place with the Company, the Company reserves the right to decline an order, in case the size of the order is large and cannot be filled.
g. Market Impact:
Some factors may rapidly affect the price of the underlying instruments/products from which the Company’s quoted price is derived and may also affect other factors listed herein. The Company will take all reasonable steps to obtain the best possible result for its Clients.
h. Partial Fills:
This is the practice of executing an order in parts if there is not enough liquidity in the market at the time in order to fill-in the full order at a specific price. Partial fills may be executed at different prices.
4. Other Key aspects of the firm’s execution arrangements
a. Slippage:
This situation occurs when there is latency between the quoted and executed price. Latency can lead to slippage i.e. the difference between the expected price of an order, and the price the order is actually executed at. Negative slippage occurs when the executed price is worse than the price requested by the Client. Positive Slippage occurs when the execution price is better than the price requested by the Client. Slippage is more likely to occur in the forex market when volatility is high, perhaps due to news events, or during times when the currency pair is trading outside peak market hours. Additionally, slippage can occur both to market and pending orders. Pending orders will be executed at the next best available price. As part of monitoring its best execution, the Company ensures that it does not apply asymmetric slippage to its clients.
b. Re-quotes:
The Company only has market execution. Thus, it will not provide a secondary quote to the Client after an order has been submitted.
‍
5. Types of Order(s) in CFDs:
a. Market Order(s):
A Market Order is an order to buy or sell a CFD at the current price. Execution of this order results in opening a position. CFDs are bought at the ASK price and sold at the BID price. Stop Loss and Take Profit Orders can be attached to a Market Order. Market Orders are offered for all types of accounts.
b. Pending Order(s):
The Company may offer the following types of Pending Orders
:
Stop Loss: this is an order that may be attached to an already open position or a pending position to exit the trade at a specified price (‘the stop loss price’). A ‘stop loss’ may be used to minimise losses, upon triggering it becomes a market order and can be executed at declared, better or worse price.
Take Profit: this is an order that may be attached to an already open position or a pending position to exit the trade at a specified price (‘the take profit price’). A ‘take profit’ may be used to secure profits and can only be executed at declared or better price.
6. Execution Venues/ Liquidity Providers:
These are the entities with which the Company places and executes Client Orders. The Execution Venue(s) that the Company is using are found in Annex I.
The Customer acknowledges that the transactions entered into with the Company for the financial instrument provided by the Company are undertaken through the trading platform of the Company. The Orders will be executed on an ‘over the counter’ basis.
The Company shall not receive any remuneration, discount or non-monetary benefit for routing client Orders to a particular execution venue which may lead to a conflict of interest. The company will not pay or be paid any fee or commission, or provide or be provided with any non monetary benefit in connection with the provision of an investment service or an ancillary service, to or by any party except the client or a person on behalf of the client, other than where the payment or benefit:
a.
is designed to enhance the quality of the relevant service to the client; and
b.
does not impair compliance with the investment firm’s duty to act honestly, fairly and professionally in accordance with the best interest of its clients.
7. Best Execution Factors
The Company takes sufficient steps to obtain the best possible result for our Clients, when executing orders, taking into account the price, costs, speed, likelihood of execution, size, nature or any other consideration relevant to the execution of the order. In relation to the best execution criteria, for orders that are not wholly covered based on your specific instructions, we shall take into consideration the execution factors and their relevant importance in the order presented below:
A. Price – High Importance
Price is one of the most important factors in order for the Company to meet its best execution obligations. The Company receives its prices from its Liquidity Providers and uses price aggregation technology to detect and quote the best Bid and Ask quote from the LPs to the trading platform. We do not however guarantee that our quoted prices will be at a price which is as good, or better, than one might have been available elsewhere.
Bid-Ask Spread: For any given financial instrument, we quote two prices: the higher price (Ask), at which the Client can buy (go long) a financial instrument, and the lower price (Bid) at which the Client can sell (go short); collectively, referred to as the Firm's prices. The difference between the Bid and the Ask price of a given financial instrument is the spread, which includes Company's mark-up.
Pending Orders: Such orders as ‘Stop Loss’ and ’Take Profit’ for opened short positions are executed at the ASK price. Such orders as ‘Stop Loss’ and ‘Take Profit’ for opened long positions are executed at the BID price.
Our price for a given financial instrument is calculated by referencing the price of the relevant underlying asset, which is obtained from third-party liquidity and data providers. We update our prices as frequently as the limitations of technology and communication links allow. We will not quote any price outside of our operational hours. The Company regularly, and at least once a year, reviews the pricing of and quality of service offered by its liquidity providers, to ensure that the prices obtained remain competitive and that their service is of high standards.
B. Costs – High Importance
Spread is the difference between the lower price (BID) and the higher price (ASK) of a given Financial Instrument. The Company provides dynamic (floating) spreads, which means that spreads are constantly updated based, among others, on the liquidity and volatility conditions of the underlying market. The Company performs real-time monitoring of its spreads at individual financial instrument level. If the actual spread is outside acceptable pre-determined parameters when compared to previous spreads received from the same Liquidity Provider, an alert is triggered for the “gap” to be investigated by the Company. Where the gap is a result, for example, market volatility, no further actions are taken. If gap is a result of a technical issue on the liquidity provider’s part, an alert is triggered for the “gap” to be investigated by the Company. Where the “gap” is a result, for example of market volatility, no further actions are taken. If the “gap” is a result of a technical issue on the liquidity provider’s part, then the Company further investigates and takes immediate corrective action.
Swap or financing fee is the charge that is applied to all positions that are left open overnight for the following trading day. It is credited to or withdrawn from trading accounts at 24:00 GMT+3 each day until the position is closed. Swap is charged every day, except for the weekends, when trading is not available. On Wednesday, the amount of Swap charged is tripled in order to compensate for the following weekend, during which swap is not charged. Swap is based on prevailing market interest rates, which may vary over time.
Commissions may be applicable. The Company may be charging the account holders a commission fee every time they are opening and closing a position. Commission fees are automatically calculated according to the volume traded. The Company’s Commissions can be found on the Company’s website and/or trading platforms.
C. Speed of Execution – High Importance
We place a significant importance in this factor when executing Client orders and to this end we maintain high speed connections through multiple servers hosted globally within the limitations of technology and communications links. However, the use of any form of unstable connection at the Client’s end, whether wireless or dial-up, may result in poor or interrupted connectivity, which may cause delays in the transmission of data between the Client and us. As the Client places Orders through the Company’s Electronic Trading Platform, the Client is exposed to risks associated with that, including the failure of hardware and software (e.g. Internet connectivity issues, server downtimes, etc). This may result that client’s Order is either not executed in accordance with his expectations or it is not executed at all. The Company does not accept any liability in the case of such a failure.
D. Likelihood of execution – Medium Importance
The Company is the sole Execution Venue for the execution of the Client’s Orders for the Financial Instruments provided by the Company and, as such, it strives to execute, in whole, all Orders placed by the Clients. However, it reserves the right to decline or partly fill in any Order or to execute the order at the first available market price without providing any justification to Client. We rely on third-party LPs for prices and available volume of the different financial instruments we offer. Therefore, the execution of Client's orders will depend on whether there are prices and liquidity available at the time these orders are received. By having various LPs, the likelihood of execution across the instruments we offer is high. This availability may be subject to variation, especially during abnormal market conditions, such as:
During market opening times.
During times of market news and events.
During periods of significant volatility.
Where there is a rapid price movement of a particular instrument, to such extent that under the rules of a relevant exchange, trading on said instrument is suspended or restricted.
Where there is insufficient liquidity for the execution of a specific volume at a specific declared price.
Where the Company internal risk limits no longer permit the acceptance of any further orders on a specific instrument.
E. Size of Order – Low Importance
The minimum size of an order may be different for each asset type and/or financial instrument. A Lot is a unit measuring the transaction amount and it is different for each type of Financial Instrument. Please refer to the website and/or platform for the value of minimum size of an order or minimum Lot for a given CFD type.
F. Likelihood of settlement – Low Importance
All transactions are settled upon execution.
G. Market Conditions – Low Importance
Some market factors may affect rapidly the Company’s quoted price of the Financial Instruments. These factors may, in turn, affect some of the other execution factors listed above. The Company takes all reasonable steps to obtain the best possible result for its Clients. The Company does not consider the above list exhaustive and the order in which the above factors are presented shall not be taken as priority factor.
8. Specific Instructions
Whenever a Client gives a specific instruction as to the execution of their order, the Company will execute that order in accordance with the Client’s specific instructions. In following those specific instructions, the Company will be deemed to have satisfied its best execution obligations in respect of that part of the order to which the specific instructions relate. If a Client requires their order to be executed in a particular manner, they must clearly state their desired method of execution when they place their order. To the extent that the Client’s specific instructions are not comprehensive, the Company will determine any non-specified aspects in accordance with this Policy. It should be noted that specific instructions from a Client may prevent the Company from taking the necessary steps it has designed and implemented in this Policy, to obtain the best possible outcome for the execution of those orders in respect of the elements covered by those instructions.
9. Monitoring and Review
The Company has processes and procedures which analyse the execution quality and monitor best execution. The Company monitors and measures the competitiveness of its prices and the speed of its execution against other Forex Brokers.
The Company’s second and third line of defences, namely the Compliance and Internal Audit perform additional reviews and assessments on best execution on a regular basis and at least annually or whenever a material change occurs that affects the Company’s ability to continue obtaining the best result for Clients’ orders.
A. Daily Best Execution Reports – Dealing desk
During the day, on the going basis, Dealers run Orders execution reports through YourBourse administrator platform to verify quality of already executed orders. The several factors taken into consideration – price, execution time, slippage, fill/reject, market depth.
MT5 online monitoring for rejects and filling orders.
Errors MT5 online monitoring
Monitoring Providers (CFH) via YourBourse – online monitoring and automatic email notifications from YourBourse
Price feed Check – comparing executed orders against the benchmark
Random Execution Trade Statistic – execution metrics for the random trades performed from test account to verify execution
B. Monthly Best Execution Reports – Dealing desk
Execution metrics per asset type – FX and NON-FX (Shares, Crypto, FX). The report includes information about slippage distribution, average execution time, rejects for the referred month.
LPs Summary Execution – average execution time and slippage achieved by the specific LP from the Company’s pool.
LPs volumes – traded volumes by the specific LP from the Company’s pool.
Slippage symmetry by order types ( market, stop loss, take profits)
Slippage symmetry by order size
LPs Spread – the average spreads for FX symbols among LPs from the Company’s pool.
These reports should be stored in an internal electronic folder.
10. Other important information
Specific Leverage restrictions apply for Retail Clients. Hedging is not permitted while using CFD Trading. Where a Customer opens a second position on the same instrument, this will be netted-off against the existing open position. CFDs are not eligible for sale or distribution in certain jurisdictions or countries. This Policy is not directed to any jurisdiction or country where its publication, availability or distribution would be contrary to local laws or regulations.
Annex 1.
List of Liquidity providers
The table below lists brokers (Liquidity Providers / Execution venues) that the Company currently uses for executing the Orders. The Company reserves the right to use other execution venues and third parties where we consider that it is appropriate in the light of this Policy, and we may from time to time add or remove an execution venue or a broker from this list. The following execution venues will be used for executing the Orders:
Execution venue
Country of Establishment
Supervisory Authority
Commencement of the relationship with the Company
Finalto Financial Services Limited
United Kingdom
Financial Conduct Authority
9th of June, 2020
EXT LTD
Cyprus
Cyprus Securities and Exchange Commission
24th of December, 2020
SM Capital Markets Ltd
Cyprus
Financial Conduct Authority
8th of August, 2024
In force from 2022-06-29
Complaints Handling Procedure
This procedure applies to CFD Trading service. You can access and download a copy of this document at any time from
www.changeinvest.com
.
This is a specific procedure that will apply when you use CFD Trading Service i.e. trade CFDs directly with Change Securities B.V. using Change Apps and lodged a Complaint. In this procedure:
“Apps”
mean the web, Android and iOS mobile apps of Change, which give access to the Services;
“Change”
means third party xChange AS, an Estonian public limited company registered under registry code 14428150, Rävala pst 4, 10143 Tallinn to whom Company has outsourced certain activities to comply with requirements included in the Dutch
Wet ter voorkoming van witwassen en financieren van terrorisme and the Santiewet 1977
, namely the application of due diligence measures, identification of politically exposed persons and customer data retention, but also customer support;
“Company”
means Change Securities B.V. (Chamber of Commerce no. 50755854, previously Optieclub.nl B.V.), Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands, who provides CFD Trading service on a cross-border basis and is authorised and regulated by the Dutch Authority for the Financial Markets (AFM);
“
Complaint
” means a statement or an expression of dissatisfaction addressed to the Company by a Complainant regarding the provision of investment and/or ancillary services provided by the Company to the Complainant;
“
Complaint Form
” means
electronic document
available on the Website that must be filled out by you to lodge a Complaint;
“
Complainant
” or “
you
” means the named natural person account holder, who has read, agreed with and accepted all the Terms and Conditions, being the authorised user of CFD Trading and owner of the Margin Account and Open CFD Positions, and has lodged a Complaint.
If you have any questions you can contact the Company by:
email:
support@changeinvest.com
;
mobile application: log in to the App and send us a secure message; or
post: Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands.
All of the terms and definitions not stipulated in this document are stipulated in the various chapters of the Terms and Conditions available on the Website.
1. Scope and purpose of the procedure
1.1. Under the law the Company is required to establish, implement and maintain effective and transparent procedures for the reasonable and prompt handling of Complaints or grievances received from Complainants and keep records of each Complaint as well as any actions taken by the Company to remedy the situation in accordance with the provisions of the competent authorities.
1.2. This procedure sets out the method for the submission of Complaints with the Company from its clients and the processes followed by the Company when dealing with such Complaints.
1.3. The Company considers having a Complaint when the Complainant has filled out the relevant Complaint Form, available on the Website, and submitted it to the Company via the following methods:
1.3.1. by email at
support@changeinvest.com
; or
1.3.2. by post Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands.
1.4. In case the Company receives a notification through the line of communication established by the Company, but which does not fall within the definition of clause 1.3 and can be characterised not as Complaint, this shall be categorised as an enquiry and will be forwarded to the relevant contact within Company to be handled accordingly. The Complainant maintains the right to request for the reclassification of the enquiry as a Complaint.
2. Addressee of the Complaint
2.1. The customer support and if necessary, member of the compliance staff, shall efficiently handle any Complaint received by a Complainant. In the case that the Complaint is against the compliance staff, the Complaint shall be handled by a director of the Company.
3. Procedure to be followed for verbal Complaint
3.1. It is the Company’s policy not to accept any verbal complaints or grievances. Should any of the Company’s employees (regardless of department) receive a verbal Complaint or grievance, the procedure stipulated in the following clauses 3.2-3.3 must be followed.
3.2. The member of the staff receiving the verbal complaint or grievance shall take all the necessary actions so that the Complaint or grievance is properly addressed. The person will inform the Complainant that all the Complaints or grievances must be made in writing by completing the relevant Complaint Form as stipulated in clause 1.3. Once the Complainant completes and submits the Complaint Form the procedure for written Complaints shall be followed as described in section 4.
3.3. The member of the staff, in addition to the above, should make all best efforts to ensure that in the case of the Complaint or grievance being of such nature that can be resolved immediately, to do so that the Complainant will not have to fill out the Complaint Form. The member of staff in such a case shall not do the following:
3.3.1. commit on behalf of the Company in taking any action prior to examining the issues in a formal manner;
3.3.2. commit in any way to the Complainant;
3.3.3. address any issues in relation to best execution; nor
3.3.4. address any issues relating to legal, compliance or regulatory issues.
4. Procedure to be followed for written Complaint
4.1. If the complaint was received in the manner not fulfilling the conditions stipulated in section 1, i.e. the complaint was received through internal channels of communication such as chat, client correspondence, on other Company’s email addresses, or by any other Company’s member of the staff, then the complaint, in the form that has been received, must be forwarded, in the form it has been received to
support@changeinvest.com
within the same working day.
4.2. Once the Complainant submits a written complaint, customer support will send an electronic acknowledgment of receipt to the Complainant’s registered email address within five (5) working days following receipt, to verify that the Company has received the written Complaint and will request the Complainant to complete the relevant Complaint Form.
4.3.	Upon completion and submission of the Complaint Form, customer support will investigate the grounds of the Complaint and if, based on the information provided, the grievance does not fall within the definition of Complaint or is not considered to be a Complaint it will be categorised as an enquiry and will be forwarded to the relevant member of the staff to be handled appropriately.
4.4.	If the grievance falls within the definition of Complaint or is considered to be a Complaint, then the member of the staff will register the Complaint to an internal registry by giving it a unique reference number and by categorising it accordingly (e.g. technical, operational, compliance, legal) for the purpose of handling the Complaint most effectively.
4.5. In addition, within five (5) working days customer support shall inform the Complainant of the following:
4.5.1. that the Complainant must use the given reference number in all future correspondence with the Company regarding the submitted Complaint;
4.5.2. the process which is followed when handling a Complaint;
4.5.3. who is the member of the staff that is dealing with the Complaint and their contact details;
4.5.4. what is the indicative handling time (as a standard 20 working days); and
4.5.5. that the Complaint handling procedure is free of charge.
4.6.	Moreover, the customer support must make sure that the following information is obtained from the Complainant, to the extent possible on the Complaint Form, and recorded:
4.6.1. full name and surname;
4.6.2. email address;
4.6.3. affected transactions (if applicable);
4.6.4. the date that the issue arose and a description of the issue;
4.6.5. the Service provided by the Company related to the Complaint;
4.6.6. member of the staff responsible for the provision of this Service (if applicable);
4.6.7. Complainant’s own description of the facts related to the Complaint, i.e. the content; and
4.6.8. reference of any correspondence exchanged between the Company and the Complainant (if applicable).
4.7.	The Company will thoroughly examine and assess the facts and the information provided by the Complainant and the relevant members of the staff. Compare these facts with the information and data which have been retrieved from the Company’s archive (i.e. the Complainant’s transactions, trading history, correspondence, other electronic records). This investigation will also include the events preceding or leading to the Complaint.
4.8.	The Company will not handle or investigate a Complaint if the Complainant does not complete the Complaint Form or does not provide the information requested in clause 4.6. of this procedure. In such an event the Company shall revert back to the Complainant and request to send any additional information. In any event, a member of senior management may contact the Complainant directly in order to obtain further clarifications and information relating to the Complaint. The Company shall need the Complainant’s cooperation in order to handle the Complaint.
4.9.	The Company upon examining the complaint and reaching a decision to this respect shall inform the Complainant about the Company’s decision, in writing and in plain language which is clearly understood, together with the reasoning of the Company’s decision and any remedial measures it intends to take.
4.10. The Company shall make every effort to resolve the complaint within fifteen (15) working days. When deemed necessary, customer support or a member of the compliance staff shall convey the complaint to the senior management for further investigation. In this case, the Company might take additional five (5) working days to finalise the reply. The senior management shall investigate further and coordinate with relevant members of the staff to attend to the subject of the Complaint.
4.11.	In the event that the Company cannot provide a response to the Complainant within the handling time given to the complainant, it will keep the Complainant informed about reasons of delay and indicate when the investigation is expected to be completed. This period of time cannot exceed two (2) months from the submission of the Complaint.
4.12. Once the Complaint is concluded and Company has reached final decision customer support will be responsible of keeping an full electronic record of the Complaint received, detailing the course of action which was taken, including what information, data and evidence were gathered, what measures were taken for the resolution, whether any conflicts of interest between the Company and its clients and between other clients were identified, what was the outcome and how that outcome was reached.
4.13. The Company shall maintain record of all complaints for a minimum period of five years after the closure of the Customer’s Margin Account.
5. Alternative ways to resolve a Complaint
5.1. If the Complainant is not fully satisfied with the Company’s final decision the case can be referred to the Dutch Financial Services Complaints Tribunal (Kifid) using Company’s relevant registration number 400.000422. The Kifid consists of the Financial Services Ombudsman and the Financial Services Disputes Committee.
5.2. Ultimately the Complainant may turn to the Dutch Authority for the Financial Markets (AFM) or to relevant courts.
6. Follow-up measures
6.1.	Customer support will analyse, on an on-going basis, Complaints handling data, in order to identify and address the causes of the individual Complaints and/or any recurring or systematic problems and/or any potential legal and operational risks. Subsequently the relevant member of the staff or senior management should be informed and if necessary, take corrective action.
6.2.	This Complaints Handling Procedure will be made available on the Website.
6.3.	The Complaints Handling Procedure is available to all the members of the staff through email and an internal folder in the Company’s channels of communication which can be accessed at any time without any restrictions.
Complaint Form
This form
is an electronic document that must be filled out by you to lodge a formal Complaint about CFD Trading service provided by Change Securities B.V. This form is part of the formal Complaints Handling Procedure regarding the investment or ancillary services provided to you.
Please note that it is Company’s policy not to accept any verbal complaints or grievances.
If you have any questions please contact the Company by email
support@changeinvest.com
, through mobile application or sending the letter to Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands.
In force from 2025-02-27
Fees and Limits
1. What are the limits of Services?
LIMIT
VALUE
COMMENT
Minimum single Fiat, Apple Pay, Instant deposit
€10.00
Change shall not accept transfers that are lower than the specific value.
Maximum single Fiat deposit
€10,000.00
Change shall not accept transfers that are higher than the specific value.
Monthly total Instant Deposits
€5,000.00
Change shall not accept Instant Deposits that in total are higher than the specific value in a calendar month.
Maximum single Instant Deposit
€5,000.00
Change shall not accept Instant Deposits, that in total are higher than the specific value.
Minimum single Fiat withdrawal
€10.00
Change shall not process Fiat withdrawals that are lower than the specific value.
Monthly total withdrawals
€15,000.00 /
€25,000.00*
* Business Account
withdrawal limit
For increased withdrawal limits, please contact Change Customer Support.
Maximum Fiat and cryptocurrency balance
unlimited
There is no limit on the total Fiat and cryptocurrency balances, although the monthly total withdrawal limit applies regardless.
Minimum amount to buy cryptocurrencies in exchange for Fiat
€10.00
You cannot buy cryptocurrencies in exchange for fiat for lower than the specific value, however the limit is not applicable for buying cryptocurrencies in exchange for other cryptocurrencies or for selling cryptocurrencies.
Minimum single cryptocurrency withdrawals based on asset type
0.001 BTC
0.02 ETH
0.2 LTC
11 USDC
11 USDT
30 XRP
0.02 SOL
20 TRX
50 DOGE
0.0006 BCH
1 ALGO
Change shall not process cryptocurrency withdrawals that are lower than the specific value.
Maximum single Apple Pay Deposit
€ 1,000.00
Change shall not accept Apple Pay Deposits that are higher than the specific value.
Monthly Total  Deposit via Apple Pay
€ 1,000.00
Change shall not accept Apple Pay Deposits that in total are higher than the specific value in a calendar month.
2. What are the conversion fees?
Conversion fee is service expense, which is applied in addition to Conversion Rate.
CRYPTOCURRENCY
VALUE
COMMENT
Bitcoin (BTC), Dai (DAI), Tether (USDT)
0.00%
Change shall not charge any fee on buying or selling BTC, DAI or USDT for Fiat or when converting from or to BTC, USDT or DAI.
0x Protocol (ZRX), 1Inch (1INCH), Aave (AAVE), Akash Network (AKT),  Algorand (ALGO), Altlayer (ALT), Ankr (ANKR), ApeCoin (APE), API3 (API3), Aptos (APT),  Arbitrum (ARB), Astar Network (ASTR), Augur (REP), Audius (AUDIO), Avalanche (AVAX), Axie Infinity  Shard (AXS), Balancer (BAL), Band Protocol  (BAND), Basic Attention Token (BAT), Big Time (BIGTIME), Bitcoin Cash (BCH), Boba Network (BOBA), BitTorrent (BIT), Blur (BLUR), Bonk (BONK), Cardano  (ADA), Celestia (TIA), Centrifuge (CFG), Chainlink (LINK), Chiliz (CHZ), Compound (COMP), Convex Finance  (CVX), Cosmos (ATOM), Curve (CRV), Dash (DASH), Decentraland  (MANA), Dogecoin (DOGE), dogwifhat (WIF), Drift (DRIFT), dYdX (DYDX), Dymension (DYM), Enjin Coin (ENJ), EOS (EOS), Ethena (ENA), Ethereum (ETH), Ethereum  Naming Service (ENS), ether.fi (ETHFI), Euler (EUL), Fantom (FTM), Fetch.ai (FET),  Filecoin (FIL), Flare (FLR), Flow (FLOW), Frax Share (FXS), Gala (GALA), Galxe (GAL), GMX (GMX), Gnosis (GNO),  Graph (GRT), Helium (HNT), Immutable (IMX), Injective (INJ), Internet Computer (ICP), JasmyCoin (JASMY), Jito Network (JTO), Jupiter (JUP), Kava (KAVA), Keep Network (KEEP),  Kusama (KSM), Kyber Network (KNC), Lido (LDO),  Litecoin (LTC), Loopring (LRC), Maker (MKR), Mango (MNGO), Mina (MINA), Mirror Protocol  (MIR), Moonbeam (GLMR), Moonriver (MOVR), Multichain (MULTI), MultiversX (EGLD),  NEAR Protocol (NEAR), Ocean (OCEAN), Official Melania Meme (MELANIA), Official Trump (TRUMP), Ondo (ONDO), Optimism (OP), Orca, (ORCA), Oxygen (OXY), Pax Gold (PAXG), Pendle (PENDLE), Pepe (PEPE), Perpetual Protocol (PERP), Polkadot (DOT), Polygon (MATIC), Portal (PORTAL), Powerledger (POWR), Pyth Network (PYTH), Quant (QNT), Qtum (QTUM),  Rarible (RARI), Raydium (RAY), Render Token (RNDR), Rocket Pool (RPL),  Sandbox (SAND), Sei (SEI), Shiba Inu (SHIB), Solana (SOL), Songbird (SGB), Stacks (STX), Stargate Finance  (STG), Stellar (XLM), Sui (SUI), SuperVerse (SUPER), Sushi (SUSHI), Star Atlas (ATLAS), Starknet Token (STRK), Storj (STORJ), Synthetix  (SNX), Tensor (TNSR), Terra (LUNA), Tezos (XTZ), THORChain (RUNE), Tron (TRX),  Uniswap (UNI), UMA (UMA), USD Coin (USDC), Wen (WEN), XRP (XRP), Yearn Finance (YFI), Yield Guild Games  (YGG), ZetaChain (ZETA)
0.10%
Change shall charge a fee on buying or selling a specified cryptocurrency for Fiat or when converting from or to USDT or DAI that is not higher than the specific percentage.
3. What are the transfer fees?
TRANSACTION
VALUE
COMMENT
Fiat deposit
0%
Change shall not charge any percentage for transferring Fiat from a bank account to the Fiat Account.
Fiat withdrawal
€1
Change shall not charge any percentage for transferring Fiat to a bank account from the Fiat Account.
Instant Deposit
0%
Change shall charge a specific percentage for using the Service of Instant Deposit in order to add to and to dispose the Fiat on the Fiat Account instantly.
Cryptocurrency deposit
0%
Change shall not charge any percentage for transferring cryptocurrencies to the Wallet.
Cryptocurrency withdrawal
‍
Reasonable concurrently general network, gas or similar fee
The Cryptocurrency withdrawal fee is displayed in the Apps before the confirmation and calculated in accordance with General and Wallet section 6.
Bitcoin (BTC), Ethereum (ETH), Litecoin (LTC), USD Coin (USDC), Tether (USDT), XRP (XRP), Algorand (ALGO), Bitcoin Cash (BCH), Doge (DOGE), Solana (SOL), Tron (TRX) withdrawal
0.0003 BTC
0.006 ETH
0.03 LTC
11 USDC
11 USDT
4 XRP
0.8 ALGO
0.005 BCH
8 DOGE
0.05 SOL
15 TRX
In addition to the network fee above, for BTC, ETH, LTC, USDC, USDT, XRP, ALGO, BCH, DOGE, SOL, TRX withdrawals Change charges the specific value.
4. What are the Account maintenance fees?
Account status
VALUE
COMMENT
Account
€0.00
Applies to an Account that does not have Passive Account status assigned to it.
Passive Account
€20.00
Applies to an Account that has Passive Account status assigned to it as per definition in the chapter
General and Wallet
. The specific fee is automatically debited on the 19th day of every calendar month.
Bug Bounty
Exciting news - we’re upgrading our Bug Bounty Programme!
Your funds and data security are paramount for us. So, we truly appreciate the time and effort you put into helping improve our app by detecting and reporting vulnerabilities to us. To make it worth your while, we’re reviewing and upgrading our Bug Bounty Programme.
The new rewards system alongside updated terms and conditions are 'under construction' as we speak. You’re still welcome to report any vulnerabilities by emailing us at
bugbounty@changeinvest.com
. However, we can’t guarantee any rewards while we’re reviewing the programme.
Thank you for your patience. Stay tuned!
In force from 2024-12-17
Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy describes the general principles on how Change processes your personal data and is applicable to any person who uses, has used or has expressed their intent to use the services of Change. All of the definitions used in and all circumstances not covered by this Privacy Policy shall be regulated by the terms and conditions of Change and/or Regulation (EU) 2016/679.
The policy concerning the processing of cookies is described in Cookie Policy and is accessible on the Website.
Change has appointed a data protection officer, who can be reached via
compliance@changeinvest.com.
All of the inquiries and complaints concerning the processing of personal data should be addressed to said email address.
1. How is personal data collected?
1.1. Change is to be considered a data controller in respect of personal data collected and processed in respect of providing Services to you.
1.2. In the case of CFD Trading Change Securities B.V. is to be considered a data controller in respect of personal data collected and processed in respect of providing services to you, in which case Change is considered either a data processor or a data controller. If the purpose and means of processing of personal data has been jointly determined by intragroup companies of Change, the parties are considered joint controllers, e.g. in cases where the purpose of processing your data is to notify you of amendments in terms and conditions, including this Privacy Policy, or marketing under our legitimate interest.
1.3. In the context of this Privacy Policy references to “we”, “us”, “our” means Change, including all of its affiliates, provided the parties are separate data controllers or joint controllers.
1.4. Generally personal data is collected directly from you, and from the information and documents you have provided. However, in order to comply with the legal obligations personal data, e.g. identification, identity document and financial data, is also collected from other sources, e.g. from third parties and public sources.
2. Which categories of personal data we are processing?
2.1. We are processing the following categories of personal data:
2.1.1. identification data, e.g. your photo, name, date and place of birth, address;
2.1.2. identity document data, e.g. photo of the document, number and validity;
2.1.3. contact data, e.g. phone number, email address;
2.1.4. financial data, e.g. ownership and source of funds and/or wealth;
2.1.5. transaction data and the nature of using the service, e.g. transaction sums, counter-parties, bank account and card number(s) and account holders;
2.1.6. other data used for performing customer due diligence measures, assessing trustworthiness and to prevent fraud, e.g. media coverage, occupation and connection to other persons, and device information and location; and
2.1.7. correspondence between you and us.
3. For which purposes personal data is processed?
3.1. In general we are processing your personal data for the performance of or entering into a contract with you, i.e. personal data is processed for the purposes of providing the services. Without processing personal data, we would be unable to provide services to you, including due to regulatory restrictions.
3.2. The purposes for which we are processing personal data are the following:
3.2.1. fulfilling a contractual obligation, e.g. executing your transaction orders and ensuring the safety of your assets;
3.2.2. fulfilling a legal obligation, e.g. ensuring the security of accessing the Account and the transactions and using the data for accounting and reporting purposes;
3.2.3. public interest, e.g. by performing necessary acts in order to prevent money laundering and the financing of terrorism and thus to ensure the proper identity verification;
3.2.4. sending informative and promotional notifications, or collecting, processing storing and disclosing personal information, e.g. name and contact information, with our partners in order to conduct campaigns and ship the rewards, under a revocable consent received from you; and
3.2.5. our legitimate interest to prevent fraud and to improve our products and services, as well as to promote the launch and usage of new functionalities and features and to illustrate the benefits and possibilities of cryptocurrencies and investing, e.g. by identifying concurrently used app versions and by sending promotional content regarding new features and products, and to conduct campaigns, including in co-operation with third-parties, and ship the rewards.
3.3. For entering into and for the performance of the contractual agreement between you and us and for public interests, Change is applying certain automated decision-making methods to assess your capability, suitability, behaviour and reputation, whether to enter into or to continue a contractual relationship. The aforesaid assessment is accompanied by human-intervention by an employee of Change, who will perform the final assessment.
3.4. For entering into a contract and for the performance of a legal obligation Change may be obliged to assess your capability, suitability, behaviour, reputation and financial situation, whether to enter into or to continue a contractual relationship with you, in which case the personal data is processed by Change as a data processor on behalf of Change Securities B.V..
4. Which persons have access to the personal data?
4.1. Your personal data is being processed by the following categories of data recipients:
4.1.1. our employees responsible for specific tasks regarding the Services;
4.1.2. data processors who help us with providing the services, e.g. service providers for the maintenance of our IT-systems and for fulfilling our legal obligations;
4.1.3. third parties to whom we are required to transfer data under applicable legislation, e.g. relevant state institutions and sector-specific authorities.
4.1.4. third parties who help us in developing and promoting the services.
4.2 Change has engaged with Veriff OÜ, a company located and registered in Estonia, as third-party service provider to obtain certain information required in relation to the fulfilment of its obligations under anti-money laundering and terrorist financing prevention rules. While providing services to Change, Veriff OÜ processes your personal data as a data processor, however, for enhancing its machine learning capabilities Veriff OÜ is also processing your personal data as a data controller. To acquaint yourself with the relevant data processing activities which Veriff OÜ undertakes as a data controller we advise you to  read and review the privacy policy located on
https://www.veriff.com/privacy-policy.
You should be aware that Change takes no responsibility in relation to processing activities Veriff OÜ undertakes as a data controller and you are free to fully and independently exercise your rights as a data subject in relation to Veriff OÜ
4.3. We are not responsible for the actions and processing activities of any third parties. Third parties are considered to be separate data controllers, whose services can be procured by concluding separate agreements with them. Third parties may transfer your personal data to Third Countries and process it for independent purposes.
4.4. Although generally the personal data is processed within the European Economic Area, certain activities may result in the transferring of personal data to Third Countries, meaning countries located outside the EU/EEA, and to countries in relation to which the EU Commission has not issued an adequacy decision, e.g. the US. For ensuring that your personal data is protected, we have committed to applying appropriate safeguards, including but not limited to assessing the security and due diligence measures and regulatory compliance of these persons, concluding relevant data processing agreements and standard data protection clauses adopted by the European Commission for the transfers. In case you wish to know more about the safeguards and obtain a relevant copy of them, please contact us using the details specified above.
4.5. We shall maintain the confidentiality of all information of which we become aware on the basis of the relationship with you, including information concerning you and the Payment Account and Payment Transactions thereof, unless the right or obligation to disclose information arises from legislation.
4.6. We shall be released from the obligation to maintain confidentiality to the extent that you have granted consent to the disclosure of information in writing or in the Apps or our Website or to the extent a disclosure of confidential information is allowed or required under applicable laws and/or mandatory orders by regulatory authorities.
5. How long is personal data stored?
5.1. Your personal data is generally retained as long as you are using the Services. After you have stopped using the Services and your Account has been closed, your personal data shall be retained as long as any claims can be presented on the basis of such data under applicable legislation.
5.2. Certain data, e.g. data obtained for the purposes of the fulfilment of obligations related to anti-money laundering and terrorist financing prevention, or data necessary for accounting purposes, shall be retained as required under applicable legislation and industry standards. Generally, respectively at least for 5 or 7 years since the date of closing the Account, but not longer than 10 years.
5.3. We shall immediately terminate processing the data that is processed under your consent, if the consent is revoked, and the processing of personal data under legitimate interest, if you have declared objection to such processing.
6. What are your rights regarding data processing?
6.1. You, as a data subject, are, at any time, entitled to exercise the following rights:
6.1.1. The right to request the correction of your personal data;
6.1.2. The right to request access to your personal data;
6.1.3. The right to request the erasure of your personal data;
6.1.4. The right to withdraw the consent on which the processing is based;
6.1.5. The right to request the restriction of processing your personal data;
6.1.6. The right to object to the processing of your personal data;
6.1.7. The right to exercise data portability in cases where such data has been provided by you for the performance of or entering into a contractual relationship by accepting the Terms or under the consent; and
6.1.8. The right to lodge a complaint respectively to Estonian Data Protection Inspectorate at
www.aki.ee
or Dutch Data Protection Authority at
https://autoriteitpersoonsgegevens.nl/en
.
‍
In force from 2022-09-29
Cookie Policy
This Cookie Policy describes the use of cookies on our Website. By using our Website, you agree to the usage of cookies. All of the terms not covered in this Cookie Policy are described elsewhere in the terms of Change accessible on our Website.
Change has appointed a data protection officer, who can be reached via
compliance@changeinvest.com
. All of the inquiries and complaints concerning the processing of personal data should be addressed to said email address.
1. What are cookies?
1.1. Cookies are small text files that are stored on your computer or mobile device when visiting a website. Cookies allow our Website to distinguish you from other users and, thus providing you a better user-experience. Cookies facilitate Change in improving our Website.
2. Important definitions
‍
Necessary cookies:
Helps us make the website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
‍
Preference cookies:
Enables us to remember relevant information that could change the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
‍
‍
‍
Statistics cookies:
Helps us understand how visitors interact with our websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
‍
Marketing cookies:
Used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
3. What are the purposes of using cookies?
3.1. Using essential cookies is required for the operation of our Website. The purposes of using such cookies include enabling you to log into the secure areas of our Website and to enter into transactions and assisting you should you request assistance from us.
3.2. Analytical/performance cookies allow us to count the number of visitors and identify their aggregate locations and their habits in using our Website. This helps us to improve the structure of our Website, e.g. by ensuring that visitors are finding what they are looking for easily. We use Google Analytics cookies that collects anonymous information by reporting website trends without identifying individual visitors. You can opt out of Google Analytics without affecting the experience on our Website by clicking this link.
3.3. Targeting cookies record your visit on our Website, the pages you have visited and the links you have followed. We will use this information to make our website and the advertising displayed on it more relevant to your interests. We may also share this information with third parties for this purpose.
4. Which cookies are used by Change?
4.1 As of 29-09-2022 Change uses the
following cookies
.
6. What about third parties?
5.1 Third parties, e.g. advertising networks and providers of external services like web traffic analysis services, may also use cookies, over which we have no control. These cookies are likely to be analytical/performance cookies or targeting cookies.
6. How to reject using cookies?
6.1 You can block the usage of cookies by changing the security settings of your browser by disabling the cookies in whole or in part. However, if you choose to block cookies, including necessary cookies, you may not be able to access all or parts of our Website.
7. How do you find out about changes to this Cookie Policy?
7.1 We regularly review and update our Cookie Policy. We will inform our visitors about updates by providing the new version of the policy on our website. For this reason, we recommend that you read this cookie policy every time you are deciding whether to accept cookies from us or not. If it is required by applicable law, we will obtain your express consent to significant changes.
General Risk Disclosure
This document applies to all Services provided via Change Apps. You can access and download a copy of this document at any time from
www.changeinvest.com
.
This notice provides you with information about the risks associated with cryptoasset services provided by Change and investment services provided by Company. In this document:
“Apps”
mean the web, Android and iOS mobile apps of Change, which give access to the Services;
“Change”
means xChange AS, an Estonian public limited company registered under registry code 14428150, Rävala pst 4, 10143 Tallinn which provides cryptoasset services under virtual asset service provider license no FVT000072 issued by Estonian FIU, and to whom Company has outsourced certain activities to comply with requirements included in the Dutch
Wet ter voorkoming van witwassen en financieren van terrorisme and the Santiewet 1977
, namely the application of due diligence measures, identification of politically exposed persons and customer data retention, but also customer support;
“Company”
means Change Securities B.V. (Chamber of Commerce no. 50755854, previously Optieclub.nl B.V.), Westeinde 89, 2211 XS Noordwijkerhout, the Netherlands, who provides CFD Trading service on a cross-border basis and is authorised and regulated by the Dutch Authority for the Financial Markets (AFM);
“
We
”, “
us
” or “
our
” means Change and/or Company depending on the specific context.
If you have any questions you can contact the Company by:
email:
support@changeinvest.com
;
mobile application: log in to the Apps and send us a secure message.
All of the terms and definitions not stipulated in this document are stipulated in the various chapters of the Terms and Conditions available on the Website.
You gain ownership of the underlying asset when using the Conversion Service offered by Change. In addition, Company offers contracts for difference (CFDs) that provide exposure to cryptoassets, stocks, commodities, ETFs or indices.
Any transactions relating to cryptoassets, stocks, ETFs and indices where leverage is offered or which allow you to enter into short-selling transactions shall be considered CFD Trading provided by Company.
Since cryptoasset markets are decentralized and not regulated to the degree of investment services then customers using the services provided by Change will not fully benefit from the protections available to clients receiving regulated investment services such as the access to the Dutch investor compensation scheme (ICS) operated by the Dutch central bank and the Dutch Financial Services Complaints Tribunal (Kifid) for dispute resolution. Customers of Company will continue to benefit from the rules relating to best execution and client money and safekeeping of client assets.
All these products carry a high degree of risk and are not suitable for many investors. This notice provides you with information about the risks associated with these products but it cannot explain all of the risks nor how such risks relate to your personal circumstances. If you are in doubt you should seek professional advice. It is important that you fully understand the risks involved before deciding to use the Services and that you have adequate financial resources to bear such risks and that you monitor your positions carefully. Trading involves risk to your capital. You should not invest money that you cannot afford to lose, however you cannot lose more than the equity in your account.
Risks associated with CFDs
CFD stands for “Contract For Difference”, meaning you are not buying the underlying asset, but rather purchasing a contract to settle the difference in the initial and ending price of the asset. When trading CFDs, you generally trade on margin, which means you only have to deposit a small percentage of the overall value of your position. This is known as “leverage”, and even small market movements may have a great impact, negative or positive on your trading account.
If the market moves against you, you may sustain a total loss greater than the funds invested in a specific position. You are responsible for all losses on your account up to the equity in your account.
Before deciding to trade on margin you should carefully consider your investment objectives, level of experience, and risk appetite. Company’s CFDs are not listed on any exchange. CFDs involve greater risk than investing in on-exchange products, as market liquidity cannot be guaranteed and it may be more difficult to liquidate an existing position. The prices and other conditions are set by us in accordance with our obligation to provide best execution as set out in our order Best Execution Policy, to act reasonably and in accordance with the applicable Terms and Conditions. The characteristics of our CFDs can vary substantially from the actual underlying market or instrument. Full details of all of our CFDs are set out on our website. In respect of corporate events with respect to the underlying assets, We do not aim to make a profit from our clients from the outcome of corporate events such as rights issues, takeovers, mergers, share distributions or consolidations and open offers. We aim to reflect the treatment we receive, or, would receive if we were hedging our exposure to you in the underlying market. Ultimately however, you are not dealing in the underlying market and therefore in relation to our CFDs the treatment you receive may be less advantageous than if you owned the underlying instrument.
CFDs are complex instruments and come with a high risk of losing money rapidly due to leverage. Between 74-89% of retail investor accounts lose money when trading CFDs. You should consider whether you understand how CFDs work, and whether you can afford to take the high risk of losing your money.
CFDs are not suited to the long term investor. If you hold a CFD open over a long period of time the associated costs increase (such as overnight fees), and it may be more beneficial to buy the underlying asset instead. Sudden market movements, known as “gapping” may occur, causing a dramatic shift in the price of an underlying asset. Gapping may occur when the underlying market is closed, meaning the price on the underlying market may open at a significantly different level, and at a less advantageous price for you.
At all times during which you have open positions, you must ensure that your account meets margin requirements, which may change from time to time. Therefore, if the price moves against you or if margin requirements have changed, you may need to provide a significant amount of additional funds to meet your margin requirement, at short notice, to maintain your open positions. If you do not do this, Company will be entitled to close one or more or all of your positions and you alone will be responsible for any losses incurred as a result.
Before we open a Margin Account for you, we are required to make an assessment of whether the product(s) and/or services you have chosen are appropriate for you, and to warn you if, on the basis of the information you provide to us, any product or service is not appropriate. If you decide to continue and open a Margin Account with us, you are confirming that you are aware of and understand the risks.
You should further ensure you are able to monitor positions on your account at all times, as you are solely responsible for this. We are not responsible for monitoring positions on your account.
Although the CFD trading platform is automated and we are giving you the best execution available, it is possible that the market price could have changed between order placement and execution time, and therefore we cannot guarantee that the price requested will be the same as the price that the order is executed, the price you receive can be in your favour or against you.
To limit losses, we require you to choose or set ourselves “stop-loss” limits. These set limits to automatically close your position when it reaches a price limit of your choice. There are however circumstances in which a “stop-loss” limit is not fully effective – for example, where there are rapid price movements, or market closure.
In addition, there are risks associated with use of online deal execution and trading systems including, but not limited to, software and hardware failure and internet disconnection.
Risks associated with cryptoasset
Since cryptoasset markets are decentralized and not regulated to the degree of investment services then customers using the services provided by Change will not fully benefit from the protections available to clients receiving regulated investment services under the so-called MiFID regime. This also means that there is no central bank that can take corrective measure to protect the value of cryptoasset in a crisis or issue more currency.
Cryptoasset market is determined only by supply and demand and is often highly unpredictable and volatile. The price of a cryptoasset is usually not transparent and highly speculative and susceptible to market manipulation. In the worst case scenario the product could be rendered worthless.
It is important to make a distinction between indicative prices which are displayed on charts and dealable prices which are displayed in the Apps. Indicative quotes only give an indication of where the market is. Because the cryptoassets markets are decentralized, meaning it lacks a single central exchange where all transactions are conducted, each market maker may quote slightly different prices. Therefore, any prices displayed on any chart made available by us or by a third party will only reflect indicative prices and not necessarily actual dealing prices where trades can be executed.
Cryptoasset trading is prone to being misused for illegal activities due to the pseudonymity or even anonymity of transactions and investors would be adversely affected if law enforcement agencies investigate any alleged illicit activities.
Accordingly, cryptoassets should be seen as an asset class with extremely high risks and you should never invest money that you cannot afford to lose. Given the foregoing, cryptoasset are not appropriate for all investors. You should not deal in these products unless you have the necessary knowledge and expertise, you understand these products’ characteristics and your exposure to risk. You should also be satisfied that the product is suitable for you in light of your circumstances and financial position. In addition, use of our Services can never be considered a safe investment rather only an investment with a high risk of loss inherently associated with it. Furthermore, our own fee is added to online quotes, if applicable, which makes trading with the Apps even more volatile.
The risk of loss in trading cryptoassets can be substantial. You should, therefore, carefully consider whether such trading is suitable for you in light of your circumstances and financial resources. You should be aware that you may sustain a total loss of the money deposited.
Since blockchains are independent public or private peer-to peer network and not in any way or manner controlled by us, we shall not be responsible for any failure and/or mistake and/or error and/or breach which shall occur in any blockchain or in any other networks in which the cryptoassets are being issued and/or traded. You will be bound and subject to any change and/or amendments in the blockchain system and subject to any applicable law which may apply to the blockchain. We make no representation or warranty of any kind, express or implied, statutory or otherwise, regarding the blockchain functionality nor for any breach of security in the blockchain.
Change does not own or control the underlying software protocols which govern the operation of cryptoasset available for trading in the Apps. In general, the underlying protocols are open source and anyone can use, copy, modify, and distribute them. Change is not responsible for operation of the underlying protocols and makes no guarantee of their functionality, security, or availability. The underlying protocols are subject to sudden changes in operating rules (so-called forks), and such events may materially affect the value, function, and/or even the name of the cryptoasset Change holds on your behalf. In the event of a fork, we may temporarily suspend operations (with or without advance notice to you) and that Change may (a) configure or reconfigure its systems or (b) decide not to support (or cease supporting) the forked protocol entirely. Change may, but is not obligated to do so, adjust your account in respect of a fork depending on the circumstances of each event attributable to any specific cryptoasset held by you.
We may elect to execute any order and/or hold any fiat money and cryptoasset via third parties. Such third parties are not banks that guarantee the deposits made to them. If any such third party loses any money, fails or goes out of business, there is no specific legal protection that covers you for losses arising from any funds or cryptoassets you may have held with such third party, even when such party is registered with a competent authority. Depending on the structure and security of the digital wallet, some may be vulnerable to hacks, resulting in the theft or loss of customer assets. Change will not be responsible in the event of losses caused by those third parties.
If at any time any of the cryptoasset that forms the subject of your order is delisted and/or we no longer support the trading in such cryptoasset for any reason, then the applicable order will be immediately closed. If Change is notified that a cryptoasset you hold is likely to be delisted and/or removed and/or canceled from any of the exchanges (some of them or all) and we believes that it shall not be able to trade in such cryptoasset, we shall make an effort to sell the cryptoasset on your behalf at such time and price, and in such manner, as it determines.
General risks
While trading using the Apps, system errors might occur. You should be aware of the risks that may result from any system failure which could mean that your order may be delayed or fail.
You acknowledge that there are risks associated with utilizing a mobile-based trading system over the internet including, but not limited to, the failure of hardware, software, and internet connections, the risk of malicious software introduction, the risk that third parties may obtain unauthorized access to information and/or assets (including your cryptoasset) stored on your behalf, cyber-attack, the cryptoasset network failure (such as blockchain), computer viruses, communication failures, disruptions, errors, distortions or delays you may experience when trading via the Services, howsoever caused, spyware, scareware, Trojan horses, worms or other malware that may affect your computer or other equipment, or any phishing, spoofing or other attack. You should also be aware that SMS and email services are vulnerable to spoofing and phishing attacks and should use care in reviewing messages purporting to originate from us.
Our fees and charges are set out on the Website and in the Apps. Please be aware of all costs and charges that apply to you, because such costs and charges will affect your profitability.
Any opinions, news, research, analyses, prices, or other information contained on the Website or in the Apps are provided as general market commentary, and do not constitute investment advice. We shall not be responsible for any loss arising from any investment based on any recommendation, forecast or other information provided.
Past performance is not an indication of future performance. The value of investments can go down as well as up.
All balances related to your Account with us are held in euros which may be different from the currency you used to deposit, accordingly you should be aware of currency fluctuations.
In force from 2025-02-10
Campaign General Terms and Conditions
1. What terms and definitions we use?
As used in these Terms, including the preamble hereof, unless expressly otherwise stated or evident in the context, capitalized terms and expressions shall have the meanings as stipulated under the chapter General and Wallet.
2. What is the scope of these Terms?
2.1. These Terms apply to all campaigns organized by Change (the “Campaigns”), where Users are awarded or have the chance to win prizes (“Prizes”), whether in fiat or cryptocurrency.
3. Are there any limitations or restrictions applicable to the Prizes?
3.1. All Prizes may be subject to a “Freeze Period,” ranging from 30 days to 180 days, at Change’s discretion. The specific duration of the Freeze Period, or a decision not to apply a Freeze Period for a particular Campaign, will be communicated prior to the start of that Campaign.
3.2. During the Freeze Period, the Prize will be visible to the User in the app; however, the User will not be able to conduct any transactions with the Prize in relation to the respective Campaign until the applicable Freeze Period has elapsed.
3.3. In the event that the client relationship is terminated during the Freeze Period, regardless of the reason for termination or whether initiated by Change or the User, the User will forfeit their right to the Prize.
4. Are there any other legal matters you should consider?
4.1. Change reserves the right to amend or update these Terms at its sole discretion, subject to applicable legal requirements. Any updates or changes will be communicated in accordance with the General and Wallet Terms and Conditions.
↑
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.veriff.com/privacy-policy:
Veriff's Privacy Notice
1. Our Privacy Notice in a nutshell
2. Definitions
3. Our main privacy principles
4. The content of Personal Data we process
5. Legal grounds and Purposes of processing
6. Technological aspects of our Service provision and development
7. Data Subject’s rights in relation to Personal Data
8. Disclosure and transfer of Personal Data
9. Security of Personal Data
10. Retention of Personal Data
11. Children’s Personal Data
12. Jurisdiction specific notices
13. Identity verification with the UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level)
14. Veriff's Demo app and testing Veriff's session flow
15. Contact details and information
16. Availability of and changes to the Privacy Notice
Veriff's Privacy Notice
Thank you for taking the time to familiarize yourself with Veriff’s (Veriff OÜ and Veriff Brazil Ltda., hereinafter “
Veriff
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”) privacy notice (the “
Privacy Notice
”) which describes how we collect, use, and disclose information about you. This Privacy Notice applies to information we collect from Data Subjects when you access or use our Services or otherwise interact with us, such as by using our demo app, or visiting our Website or offices.
Please note that Veriff’s employees and job applicants are not included in the Data Subject definition of this Privacy Notice, as relevant processing activities are mainly covered by other policies. If you are interested in the data processing activities during our recruitment process, please review our
Recruitment Privacy Notice
.
Veriff is specialized in providing online identification services. We consider ourselves the new standard in identity verification, and when you engage with our Customer, we allow our Customers to verify your identity document e.g. driver’s license, passport or ID card. We mainly process End-User Personal Data as a Data Processor for the benefit of the Customer in order to provide our Services to our Customers. Therefore, you should always read both this Privacy Notice and the information about data processing according to the Customer’s privacy notice (i.e., the privacy notice of the company for whom you identify yourself).
If Veriff is acting as a controller of your personal data (specific activities described in this Privacy Notice), either Veriff OÜ or Veriff Brazil Ltda. will act as the data controller, depending on the entity you are communicating and/or contracting with.
1. Our Privacy Notice in a nutshell
Here is information on this Privacy Notice in a nutshell.
1.1 In this Privacy Notice, we explain how and on what basis we collect, store and process Personal Data of Data Subjects. We also explain what Data Subjects’ rights are and our obligations and liabilities.
1.2
Except as otherwise described in this Privacy Notice, Veriff processes End-Users’ information as directed by our Customers for the provision of our Services. Our Customers who are the Data Controllers of End-User Personal Data determine the purpose of processing End-User Personal Data and, accordingly, Veriff is a Data Processor of End-User Personal Data with respect to those Services. Veriff is always a Data Controller for Personal Data of other Data Subjects, such as Visitors and Office Visitors. For End-Users to fully understand how Personal Data is processed in connection with the Service, End-Users should review both privacy notices, i.e., this Privacy Notice shared with the End-Users by Veriff and the privacy notices of those Customers’, whose services the End-Users are getting verified for.
1.3
You can find jurisdiction specific notices below in
section 12
, such as Additional Information for Individuals residing in certain U.S. States (see section 12.1) and Notice to Individuals Who are Residents of the State of Illinois and the State of Texas (see section 12.2).
1.4
For information about verifying your identity by the Customer using the UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level), please see section 13.
1.5
Please review this Privacy Notice carefully and contact us if you have any comments, questions or concerns. You can reach our Data Protection Officer (DPO) via email at
privacy@veriff.com
or by
submitting a form
.
2. Definitions
Here you can find the meanings of the most important terms in this Privacy Notice to help you understand how and for what we are processing your Personal Data.
Agreement
– the service agreement entered into between Veriff and Customers, including service agreements for trials and partnership agreements.
Customer
– the legal entity to whom we intend to provide or already provide our Services under the Agreement, including Veriff’s partners under a partnership agreement.
Customer Representative
– natural person representing the Customer, including any natural person with whom we communicate (i) as the representative of a potential Customer prior to conclusion of the Agreement, (ii) during the Agreement term as the representative of our Customer, and (iii) after the Agreement term as a representative of former Customer, as relevant.
Data Controller
– a legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Data. Except as otherwise provided in this Privacy Notice, Customers are Data Controllers for End-User Personal Data and give instructions regarding processing to Veriff.
Data Processor
– a legal person, public authority, agency, or other body which processes personal data on behalf of a Data Controller. Except as otherwise provided in this Privacy Notice, Veriff processes End-User Personal Data as a Data Processor on behalf of Customers who are the Data Controllers. For all other Data Subjects, Veriff is acting as the Data Controller.
Data Providers
– these are entities, such as public authorities or our Data Processors, from whom we may collect Personal Data for verification purposes. For example, we may check the End-User-provided information against the official public registry or other fraud prevention services.
Data Subject / you
– a natural person or individual about whom we have Personal Data, including Customer Representatives, End-Users, Visitors, Office Visitors, natural persons who provide us feedback (including research and inquiry-related data) and other natural persons whose Personal Data we may process.
Demo app
– the app owned by Veriff, which can be downloaded in App Store or Google Play, which allows you to test Veriff’s verification flows as a Data Subject.
EEA
– European Economic Area (the European Union Member States, Norway, Iceland and Liechtenstein).
End-User
– the natural person regarding whom we collect Personal Data from via the Service at the request of the Customer or any other natural person accessing or using the Service.
Office Visitor
– is any person visiting the office premises of Veriff.
Personal Data or Personal Information
– any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (the Data Subject), subject to applicable data protection laws; an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person. Anonymized data is de-identified and not Personal Data.
Politically exposed person (PEP)
– politically exposed person including their family members and close associates in accordance with the applicable legal acts regards to prevention of money laundering or terrorist financing (such as a natural person who is or who has been entrusted with prominent public functions, e.g. member of parliament or of a similar legislative body, a member of a governing body of a political party, a member of a supreme court).
Privacy Notice
– this privacy notice, made available at
https://www.veriff.com/privacy-notice
.
Service(s)
– personal identity verification service and connected services (such as any ongoing authentication services, assisting services, fraud prevention and other similar services) provided by us to Customers.
Visitor
– is any person visiting Veriff’s Website.
Website or Veriff’s Website
–
https://www.veriff.com/
, including its subpages and subdomains, operated by Veriff.
3. Our main privacy principles
Here you can find the privacy principles we follow when processing Personal Data.
We follow what we call the “Fundamental Six”, that is, six principles regarding Veriff’s data processing activities:
(1) First, we strive to process Personal Data in a
reliable and confidential way
. Each person’s right to the protection of their Personal Data is important to us and we shall do our best to ensure that Personal Data collected by us is adequately protected. We will do our best efforts to regularly evaluate the risks associated with the processing of Personal Data and apply appropriate mitigation strategies to hedge risks.
(2) Second,
data protection is an integral part of our Service
. We care about developing and deploying services that take into account privacy by design and privacy by default principles. Compliance with our Privacy Notice is integrated into our day-to-day activities, services and processes, and our development efforts. We understand that compliance with data protection rules takes place through our employees. Therefore, we consider it important and we seek to ensure that our employees know and comply with the requirements thereof. We expect, instruct and train our employees to respect our privacy requirements.
(3) Third,
we process Personal Data lawfully and purposefully
. We set clear goals for the processing of Personal Data and process Personal Data for these purposes only. We refrain from collecting or processing the data that we do not need. Veriff aims to delete/blur or make in other ways unreadable any data or documents presented in the session that are not necessary for Veriff’s service provision. This also means all transfers of Personal Data must have a valid legal basis.
(4) Fourth,
we process Personal Data in a transparent and fair way
. We strive for an appropriate, secure, honest and lawful manner of processing the Personal Data to prevent the unauthorized disclosure or inappropriate use of Personal Data. We also work to eliminate the possibility of discrimination or bias in our Service.
(5) Fifth,
we store Personal Data only for as long as the retention of data is required
by law, a contract or is necessary for the provision or development of our Services or required for protecting us against legal claims. At the end of the retention period, we shall permanently erase the Personal Data or anonymize it.
(6) Sixth,
we do our best to make sure that the Personal Data we process is accurate
and limited to what is necessary for the purpose for which it was collected.
4. The content of Personal Data we process
Here you can find what Personal Data we process about End-Users, Customer Representatives, Visitors and Office Visitors.
Personal Data we process about End-Users
4.1. We provide personal identity verification services to Customers.
This means we verify End-Users, i.e., you. For that you have acknowledged data processing according to the Customer’s privacy notice and data processing by us in accordance with this Privacy Notice. We may collect and process, among other data, the following Personal Data collected either directly from you or from the Customer:
(1) personal information concerning the End-User, which mainly consists of information on the End-User’s document and/or extracted from the document, for example name, sex, personal identification number or national equivalent, date of birth, estimated age, legal capacity, nationality, citizenship, organ donor status, eye color, weight and height, as well as the historic data of that End-User that may have been stored with us during previous interactions within the retention periods;
(2) document details, such as the name of the document, issuing country, number, expiration date, information embedded to document barcodes (may vary depending on the document) and security features;
(3) identity verification data, such as photographs taken from you and your document, and video and sound recording of the verification process (of the whole session, if such recording is enabled by the Customer), and the checks results;
(4) contact details, such as address, e-mail address, telephone numbers, IP address and, if relevant, presented document type (e.g. utility bill);
(5) technical data (
Device Signature
), including but not limited to information about the date, time and your activity in the Services, your IP address and domain name, your software and hardware attributes as well as your general geographic location (
e.g.
city, state, country);
(6) machine-readable data, metadata and device and network information;
(7) photos and videos as well as data, such as face scans and other measurements, extracted from the same which are used to authenticate the End-User or compare the End-User’s face to identity document photos - some of this extracted data may be considered biometric data and/or sensitive Personal Data (also "special category of personal data", hereinafter referred to as “sensitive Personal Data”) under applicable data protection laws in certain jurisdictions;
(8) publicly available relevant data and data from external registries, e.g. information about being a politically exposed person (PEP), checks in public sanction lists and other information from such registries, as determined by the Customer;
(9) personal information provided by the End-User, e.g. data from communications with us, feedback data;
(10) personal information provided by natural persons who have participated in our product and market research initiatives;
(11) personal information that we have received from the Customer, e.g. contact details;
(12) evidence and records of legal basis (including consents), for example in cases where we are required or have elected to obtain a consent or a written release or another legal basis prior to processing certain Personal Data.
4.2 We also offer ongoing authentication services to our Customers.
This means that we may use the above mentioned data, but in particular the End-User’s photos and videos as well as data extracted from the same, such as face scans and other measurements, and other documents to verify End-User’s identity on an ongoing basis, for example, to grant the End-User access to our Customer’s services, among other authentication use-cases as determined by our Customer. Such extracted data may be biometric data and/or sensitive Personal Data under applicable data protection laws in certain jurisdictions. We only use such extracted data for the provision of the Service and related business purposes, such as maintaining, improving, upgrading or enhancing the Service. We do not use such extracted data for the purpose of inferring characteristics about you for any other reasons.
4.3 How we obtain End-User’s Personal Data.
We provide our Services to Customers and collect your data from the Customer and/or as you go through the Service flow. This means our Customers are responsible for disclosing to you their privacy notice and any information about the collection of your Personal Data by us on their behalf. Based on an authorization we receive from the Customer, we also collect your Personal Data independently from Data Providers, e.g. to offer our Services within a trust-based relationship and to prevent fraud. For example, if we need to verify the validity of your
identification document
, we may inquire for additional information from the appropriate registry or from other fraud prevention services at the direction of the Customer. For fraud prevention and detection purposes, subject to applicable laws, we may also collect information about compromised identities, for example images or device or network information which have been leaked or used to commit repetitive fraud via Veriff’s service (see
list of Data Providers
).
4.4
Customers may have access to your Personal Data. We may share your Personal Data including identity verification data with the Customer through which you used our identity verification service.
4.5
Please note that providing your Personal Data is voluntary. However, the decision not to do so may mean that you are not able to verify your identity via our Service.
Personal Data we process about the Customer Representatives
4.6 We need to process Customer Representative data
to engage new Customers, enter into the Agreement, to provide our Service, to communicate with the representative of our Customer and for other lawful reasons. This means we may process, among other information, the following data of the Customer Representative:
(1) information of the representative, such as name, job title, position, and contact information;
(2) information in connection with provision of the Service, such as data from communication with us;
(3) data from Customer Representative calls, such as video, image and sound recordings;
(4) technical data (
Device Signature
), including but not limited to information about the date, time and your activity in the Services, your IP address and domain name, and your software and hardware attributes as well as your general geographic location (
e.g.
city, country);
(5) publicly available relevant data;
(6) if the Customer is subject to Veriff’s KYB procedure, identity verification data of Customer Representative, including the data categories listed in Section 4.1 of this Privacy Notice.
4.7 How we obtain Customer Representative’s Personal Data.
We collect this data either from you directly when you communicate with us directly, e.g. by sending us an email, providing us with your Personal Data on the phone or through our customer support tools. The identity verification data is collected when the Customer Representative completes the identity verification step as may be required before granting full access to the Service to the Customer. We may also collect some of your Personal Data in the course of provision of the Service to your employer. We collect information about the Customer (including about relevant representatives of the Customer) from publicly available sources. We only gather relevant and necessary data in order to validate the right of representation e.g. this may include verification of your identity, processing of your Personal Data for introducing the Service (demo) etc.
4.8
Please note, the provision of Personal Data is voluntary. However, if you do not provide your Personal Data, the Customer may not be able to make use of the full range of our Services.
Other Personal Data we process about Visitors, Customer Representatives with an account on our Website and/or End-Users of our Service
4.9
When you visit our Website and/or Service, we may use cookies and similar technologies (collectively “Cookies”), including those provided by third parties, to collect information about your use of our Website and/or Service and other websites and mobile apps, including:
(1) your IP address, and time, and approximate location inferred from your IP address;
(2) usage of the Website and/or Service and other web log data, such as the pages you visit on the Website, the date and time of your visit, the files that you download and the URLs from the websites you visit before and after navigating to the Website;
(3) technical data (
Device Signature
), including but not limited to information about your IP address and domain name, your software and hardware attributes (including device IDs) and your general geographic location (e.g. city, country);
(4) e-mail addresses, when you subscribe to Veriff’s newsletters or download Veriff’s content.
4.10 Purpose of processing with the help of Cookies and related activities.
We use the data collected from Visitors, including through Cookies, to improve our Service and make use of our Service more convenient. For example, Cookies help to enable Website and Service features, to analyze and track Website usage and activity, including for quality assurance and to determine the popularity of certain content, and to personalize your experience, such as by remembering your customized choices. We also use Cookies for our marketing efforts, including to ensure we deliver to you the most relevant content, to deliver advertising targeted to you on other companies’ sites and mobile apps, understand the effectiveness of this advertising, and to make our marketing efforts more efficient subject to applicable laws. For Visitors outside the U.S., read our
Cookie Notice
for more details regarding your controls with respect to Cookies. For Visitors inside the U.S., depending on where you reside, you can adjust certain cookie settings on our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
(see section 7.4(10) for more information).
In addition to ad targeting activities that rely on cookies and similar technologies, we work with advertising partners to translate other identifiers, such as your email address or phone number, into a unique identifier (called a hashed value) that such partners can then use to show ads that promote Veriff that are more relevant to you across the web and in mobile apps. Depending on where you reside, you may have the right to opt out of these disclosures by filling out the form included within our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
(see section 7.4(10) for more information).
Personal Data we process related to responsible disclosure
.
4.11
If you decide to contact Veriff related to reporting an issue mentioned in our
Responsible Disclosure Policy
, we only process the following Personal Data about you:
(1) name;
(2) e-mail address;
(3) picture, if you consent to disclosing it in our
Hall of Fame
.
Personal Data we process related to the Demo app and testing Veriff’s session flow.
4.12
If you decide to download and use Veriff’s Demo app or test Veriff’s session flow on our Website, we may record identity verification data (see section 4.1(3)) and technical data (see section 4.1(5)).
Personal Data we process related to our Office Visitors.
4.13
If you visit the office premises and workplaces of Veriff, this means we may process, among other information, the following Personal Data about you:
(1) name;
(2) e-mail address;
(3) photo;
(4) visuals captured via video surveillance equipment;
(5) if you use Veriff’s office WiFi network, then the source IP addresses and ports, destination addresses and ports, source MAC addresses;
(6) during the widespread of infectious diseases (e.g., COVID-19), subject to applicable laws, proof of vaccination, valid negative test result, recovery certificate or other relevant data to ensure a safe visit.
5. Legal grounds and Purposes of processing
Here you may read why and on what grounds we process your Personal Data.
5.1 We process Personal Data for the provision of our Services.
Regarding Personal Data about End-Users, Veriff's main purpose for processing is to provide our Services to our Customers.
(1) Generally, the main purpose of the Service is to verify your identity, and for this purpose we capture photos and video (if applicable) of the verification session as well as data extracted from the same, such as face scans and other measurements (such extracted data may be biometric data and/or sensitive Personal Data in certain jurisdictions), and the document(s) provided for verification. In addition, for verification, we conduct fraud prevention and detection checks that are an integral part of our Service. Identification process results with information about the completed checks are categorized as “Approved”, “Resubmission needed” or “Declined”.
(2) In some cases, we may also further check whether we have previously verified an End-User on behalf of the same or a different Customer by comparing the session with the previous session. This helps our Customers not only to verify identities but further protects them and their End-Users by helping them understand when an End-User may be generating multiple identities, tampering documents or manipulating device or network information. To do all of this, we closely examine the information provided by the End-User, including machine-readable data, metadata and device and network information.
(3) We mainly process End-User Personal Data as a Data Processor for the benefit of the Customer in order to fulfill the Agreement entered into with the Customer for (i) performance of the Agreement (including for the provision of the Service, and performance of any obligations or realization of any rights arising from the Agreement; (ii) the purpose of realization of rights and fulfillment of obligations deriving from legal acts; and (iii) processing your inquiries and requests.
(4) The legal basis for the processing depends on the Customer as the use cases and related legal requirements vary from Customer to Customer. The legal basis is selected and ensured by the Customer. In some cases we or our Customer may ask you to grant us
consent for processing
. Veriff may, as determined and as appropriate, choose to collect the consent itself, however, the relationship between the End-User and the Customer remains unaffected for such collection of consent by Veriff. Please note that we cannot provide the Service in respect of an anonymous End-User, and therefore the use of our Service is subject to the disclosure of Personal Data to us and allowing the processing of Personal Data by the Customer and us. However, giving consent is voluntary, but failure to do so may mean that we may not be able to provide the Service. For example, we will not be able to verify your identity. If you have granted the Customer and/or us a consent to process Personal Data, the details of such processes and purposes thereof will be outlined in the consent itself.
(5) To the extent permitted by law and the Agreement, Veriff may also use Personal Data for other reasonably necessary operational purposes as part of provision of the Service, or rely on its legitimate interest for such processing as described in the next section.
5.2 We also may process Personal Data of Data Subjects, including End-Users, as a Controller if processing is necessary in our legitimate interests in compliance with applicable data protection laws
, meaning our interest in the management and direction of our business in order to be able to offer the best possible services on the market. Pursuant to our “Fundamental Six” principles for data processing, we only process Personal Data on this legal basis (legitimate interest) after careful assessment in order to ascertain that the legitimate interest is in compliance with the interests and rights of a Data Subject (after carrying out the so-called three-step test) and to the extent it is permitted by law and the Agreement, as applicable. For our legitimate interest, we may process data for the following purposes:
(1) for analyzing the use of our Service, and using research and analysis results, among other methods, for carrying out satisfaction surveys, feedback questionnaires and developing our products and services, including development of autonomous and automated decision-making processes;
(2) for sending out newsletters, for marketing and developing and promoting our Services, for organization of campaigns, including personalized and targeted campaigns, and measuring the effectiveness of the performed marketing activities, as noted above, we will only rely on our legitimate interest to the extent this is permitted by law and the Agreement. Please note that for sending out newsletters, we only process your contact details;
(3) for ensuring a trust-based relationship with Customers and End-Users, this includes for example, identity verification of Customer Representative, determining the ultimate beneficiaries and PEP status, as well as other activities necessary to prevent fraud, including checks in public sanction lists or our own Service history;
(4) for administration and analysis of the Customer base to improve the availability, selection and quality of Services and products, and to make our Services more personalized and the best possible;
(5) for building and managing our Customer relationships;
(6) for analysis of identifiers and Personal Data collected upon the visit of websites, mobile applications and other Services. We may use the collected data for web analysis or for the analysis of mobile and information society services, for ensuring and improving functioning, for statistical purposes and for analyzing Visitor and Customer Representative behavior, and for improving the experience of Visitors and Customer Representatives and for providing better and more personalized Services;
(7) for monitoring the Services. We may record the messages and instructions given on our premises or by means of communication (e-mail, telephone, etc.), as well as information and other operations carried out by us, and shall use those recordings as needed to evidence instructions or other operations;
(8) for network, information and cyber security considerations, for example, for fighting against piracy and for ensuring the security of the Websites and Service, as well as for the measures taken for making and storing backup copies;
(9) for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; and ensuring compliance with applicable regulations, including retaining proof of evidence of such for compliance with our legal obligations;
(10) for conducting product and market research for purposes of quality assurance, product improvements, developments and assessing market fit, this includes contacting and communication, interviews, making conclusions, recording of such communications for a limited period of time, etc. with End-Users, Customer Representatives and other relevant data subjects. This includes creating anonymized data or anonymized or aggregated overviews and summaries of the aforementioned. Please note that Veriff processes, maintains, and uses aggregated or de-identified information only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify such information, except as permitted by law;
(11) for satisfying our legal obligations with respect to the processing and retention of Personal Data, including for obtaining the relevant legal basis for processing certain Personal Data concerning certain End-Users. Obtaining and maintaining records that such legal basis has been obtained by us is important for us to be able to prove that we comply and adhere to our legal obligations outside of and in the European Union;
(12) for fraud prevention and detection purposes, to identify signs of fraud based on our internal fraud framework and advanced fraud prevention and detection techniques and to conduct certain checks against third party sites, e.g., checks against authority databases;
(13) for developing, testing, improving and altering the functionality of the Service, including for machine learning (as specified in section 6 below), data annotation, testing and training, and producing anonymized or anonymized and aggregated statistical reports and research. This may include anonymizing Personal Data;
(14) for reasons of substantial public interest on the basis of law, including but not limited to activities relating to fraud prevention and non-discrimination (e.g., bias mitigation).
5.3 We may ask you to give us your consent for processing.
Veriff can process your Personal Data if you have given consent to the processing of your Personal Data for one or more specific purposes. Please note that giving consent is voluntary and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. For example, you can ask us to stop using your personal data for direct marketing purposes by using the unsubscribe function at the end of the marketing email. However, we remind you that the withdrawal of consent does not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. These are some of the cases where Veriff processes your data based on your consent.
(1) Your consent is the legal basis for processing Personal Data when you share your
findings related to responsible disclosure
. Publishing your name and/or picture on our website is only done under your written consent (
read more
about our bug bounty program and responsible disclosures
)
.
(2) Based on your consent, we may use your Personal Data to send you
marketing
information about our Service which you have requested from us. Including, if you have submitted a request and/or filled out a relevant form on the Website.
(3) Veriff asks Customer Representative's consent before recording audio and video of the
Customer Representative call
. The recording is used solely for Veriff's analytical purposes and improvement of Veriff's Services and processes. However, please note that the processing may not be based on your consent and the withdrawal of your consent may not be applicable in case of recording different communications (including video) for product and market research (see as described in p 5.2(10)).
(4) Veriff asks for Customer Representative’s consent to process some data for Customer Representative’s identity verification, such as the data described in Section 4.1(7) of this Privacy Notice. In case you as the Customer Representative want to withdraw your consent or need assistance with alternative identity verification options, please submit your request to support@veriff.com.
(5) Veriff asks for your consent before you use Veriff’s
demo app or test Veriff's session flow on our website
. This is for the purpose of testing Veriff’s verification flow. More information about Veriff’s Demo app can be found in section 14.
(6) We may use your consent as the basis for the processing of personal data also in other cases. The purpose is then specified at the time of the collection of the consent.
5.4 Processing related to Office Visitors.
When you visit the office premises and workplaces, we process your Personal Data if processing is necessary in our legitimate interests. For example, our legitimate interest in detecting and preventing harmful or unlawful actions, ensuring safety of Veriff’s property, confidential information and employees and establishing, exercising or defending of legal claims we may process Personal Data for the following purposes:
(1) registering your visit to the office;
(2) conducting regular video surveillance in the marked areas;
(3) monitoring the use of Veriff's office WiFi network and logging the traffic in the network. Such data is processed if you connect any of your devices to Veriff's office WiFi network during your visit;
(4) ensuring the health and safety during emergency situations such as in case of widespread infectious diseases subject to applicable laws
. During the spread of infectious diseases (e.g., COVID-19), for the purpose of ensuring adequate protection of the health and safety of Veriff’s employees in the workplace, you may be required to provide proof of vaccination, valid negative test result, recovery certificate or other relevant data. In case you have no proof to provide, or you present medical contraindication to vaccination as proof, you will be offered on-site rapid testing, if available. Health related data contained in the presented information may be sensitive Personal Data. Before presenting any such Personal Data you are asked to provide us with explicit consent to visually assess your admissibility to the office premises and workplaces. In any case, no information presented to Veriff is retained, meaning that no Personal Data will be accessible to Veriff after the moment you present the information. Please note that giving consent is voluntary and you have the opportunity to withdraw your consent at any time, however if you refuse to provide the proof, conduct the rapid testing or if the rapid test result is positive, you must leave the office immediately.
5.5 Processing for a new purpose.
When Personal Data processing is carried out for a new purpose different from those for which the Personal Data was originally collected or is not based on the consent given by the Data Subject, we shall carefully assess the permissibility of such new processing under applicable laws. In order to determine whether the processing for the new purpose follows the purpose for which the Personal Data was originally collected, Veriff shall take into consideration, inter alia, the following:
(1) any link between the old and new purposes for which the Personal Data was collected and the intended further purposes of processing;
(2) the context of collecting the Personal Data, in particular regarding the relationship between the Data Subject and us;
(3) the nature of the Personal Data, in particular whether sensitive Personal Data are processed;
(4) possible consequences of the intended further processing for the Data Subjects;
(5) existence of appropriate protection measures which may consist in, for example, encryption, pseudonymization and anonymization.
6. Technological aspects of our Service provision and development
To verify your identity in a secure and less error-prone way, we use automatic algorithms and machine learning for our Service. Read about it in this section.
6.1 Machine learning means the use and development of computer systems
that are able to learn and adapt without following explicit instructions, by using algorithms and statistical models to analyze and draw inferences from patterns in data. Using machine learning helps us to recognize specific patterns in information and make predictions about new sets of information based on those patterns. The main aim of teaching our models is to have more precise (i.e. accurate, less error-prone) and safe models that also avoid bias. All models are constantly reviewed by the model itself and by humans, and adjustments for more precise and error-free results are made, as necessary. As a result of such machine learning processes Veriff's Service improves.
6.2
It is important that algorithms are built, trained and tested on training sets, which consist of real data (see description of data categories above in Section 4.1) or anonymized data. All machine learning models are highly dependent on the quality of input data. Such processing is only done for internal use to improve and develop our Services and done only based on the contractual mandate received from our Customers under the precondition that a valid legal basis has been obtained.
6.3
Veriff stands for the concept that machine learning is conducted in an ethical and trustworthy way that respects human rights and freedoms. Machine learning as a tool will enable End-Users to receive better, more secure and faster services provided by Veriff's Customers and help to prevent and detect fraud. Datasets used to develop, test and train are kept in separate, monitored and highly secure data research environments.
6.4 Veriff uses a verification engine trained with machine learning to provide Services to our Customers
. The verification process is either automated, semi-automated or done by a human:
(1)
Semi-automated verification process
. This means that a human will be involved if the automated verification algorithm (the Verification Engine) is not able to reach a decision on its own. Simply put the verification engine checks the input data against the predetermined decision profile and based on that reaches a decision. The Verification Engine is constantly learning to correctly classify and match information, detect identity fraud or theft, and to verify identity, however the assistance of a human could be needed if the picture is blurry, confidence of the quality of extracted information is low or the Verification Engine runs into some other difficulty in analyzing the verification session.
(2)
Fully automated verification process.
This means that the Verification Engine verifies your identity without human involvement. When performing a fully automated verification process, our Customer informs you of the automated processing and may ask your explicit consent to do this. However, in some cases, where the Customer has other legal grounds for such processing e.g. obligations under applicable law – consent may not be needed. You have the right to ask for information and an explanation regarding the logic behind the decision the Verification Engine has made; at any time, you will have the right to request human intervention or object to the decision made on grounds relating to your particular situation.
(3) We may have different solutions for processing with different Customers, e.g. in some cases the verification session will
only be analyzed by a human
.
6.5
We would like to point out that the decision on whether the Customer provides its service to the End-User is made by the Customer. Meaning, even if the verification flow has been fully automated, the verification result will be taken into account by the Customer for the decision on whether to provide its service or not. The verification results itself - “Approved”, “Resubmission needed” or “Declined” - are not determinative for whether the Customer’s service is provided to the End-User.
6.6 Machine learning is also the driving engine for Veriff's innovation
when improving our Services, testing new features and ensuring quality Services. For further improvement of our Services, Service performance and features testing (A/B tests) is used to analyze the End-User experience and response regarding changes to the structure, text or any other feature of Veriff's Service.
6.7
Fraud prevention and detection is a vital part of Veriff’s Service. Detection of activities matching a certain pattern may lead to profile generation, in particular for fraud prevention and detection purposes. In compliance with the instructions received from the Customer, Veriff may analyze and compare the data points available in relation to the End-User as part of the Service. For example, Veriff may compare if session media matches each other and if technical data indicates associations with previously occurred suspicious sessions. Such processing activity may be deemed as generating a profile of the End-User. Results of such analysis are displayed to the Customer.
7. Data Subject’s rights in relation to Personal Data
Read about your data protection rights.
7.1
Depending on where you reside, you may have the right to (1) request to know more about and access your personal information, (2) request deletion of your personal information, (3) request correction of inaccurate personal information; (4) object to certain processing, (5) withdraw your consent where we process your information on that basis, and (6) request we restrict certain processing. More detailed information about each right is provided below.
7.2
If you wish to exercise any of
your rights regarding Personal Data
or ask questions about the Privacy Notice, please submit a corresponding request to us at
privacy@veriff.com
or via
this form
. We will respond to your request by email as a rule no later than within one month or sooner if required by applicable law.
7.3
Please note that before we can provide you with the requested information regarding your Personal Data, we may need to verify your identity such as by asking you to provide information related to your recent interactions with us, your relationship to us, your session information, or account registration information. Please also note that if your request concerns data we have processed as a Data Processor (i.e. in the course of Service provision), you must submit your request to the Customer who is the Data Controller. The Data Controller can fulfill your request, as relevant. We will inform you if this is the case.
7.4
Depending on where you reside, you as a Data Subject may have the following rights in relation to your Personal Data:
(1)
The right to know:
The right to get confirmation whether we are processing Personal Data about you and to obtain certain personalized details about the Personal Data we have collected about you, including:
the categories of Personal Data collected;
the categories of sources of the Personal Data;
the purposes for which the Personal Data were collected;
the categories of Personal Data disclosed to third parties (if any), and the categories of recipients to whom the Personal Data were disclosed;
information about automated decision-making (if any);
the categories of Personal Data shared for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (if any), and the categories of recipients to whom the Personal Data were disclosed for those purposes; and
the categories of Personal Data sold (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the Personal Data were sold. Please note that as stated in section 7.4(10) below, we generally do not sell your data that we collect in the course of providing identity verification services nor share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
(2)
The right to access & portability:
The right to obtain access to the Personal Data we have collected about you and the right to obtain a copy of the Personal Data in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another entity without hindrance.
(3)
The right to correction:
The right to correct inaccuracies in your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the personal data.
(4)
The right to deletion:
The right to have us delete the personal data we maintain about you.
(5)
The right to non-discrimination:
The right to not receive retaliatory or discriminatory treatment in connection with a request to exercise the above rights. However, please note that if you exercise these rights it limits our ability to process Personal Data, we may no longer be able to engage with you in the same manner.
(6)
The right to withdraw the consent:
The right to take back the consent you have given to us for the processing of Personal Data. Please note that withdrawal of your consent shall not affect the legality of the processing that was made on the basis of consent before the withdrawal.
(7)
The right to object:
The Right to file an objection if your Personal Data processing takes place on the basis of our legitimate interest or public interest.
(8)
The right to restriction of processing:
The right which in certain cases allows you to direct us to limit the processing of your Personal Data for a certain period of time (e.g., if you have filed an objection to Personal Data processing).
(9)
The right to submit a complaint and make appeals:
If you find that applicable data protection laws have not been complied with, we would appreciate it if you contact us at
privacy@veriff.com
(including for any appeals of our decisions). However, you also have the right to complain directly to a data protection authority about our collection, use or other processing of your Personal Data.
For more information, please contact your local data protection authority in the EEA or in the United Kingdom. The Estonian Data Protection Inspectorate is the lead data protection supervisory authority for Veriff (registered office at 39 Tatari St., 10134 Tallinn, phone nr + 372 627 4135, e-mail
info@aki.ee
).
If you are in the United States and have concerns about the results of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
If the processing of your Personal Data is subject to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (Law No. 13,709/2018, as amended), you can contact our DPO MKR Consultoria Ltda at
dpo@veriff.com
, and you also have the right to file a petition directly to the Brazilian Data Protection Authority (ANPD).
(10)
Opting out of targeted advertising, sharing, and sales.
Our “sale,” “sharing” and “targeted advertising” activities do not apply to personal information that we collect in the course of providing identity verification services to our Customers. In the US, some of the activities described in sections 4.9 and 4.10 above may be considered “sales” or “sharing” of your personal data or use of your data for “targeted advertising” under the law that applies to you. Depending on where you reside, you may opt out of cookie-based ad targeting on our website by clicking the “Opt-out” button from within our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
. Your opt-out choice will be linked to your browser only; therefore, you will need to renew your opt-out choice if you use a new browser or device to access our Websites or Services, or if you clear your cookies. You may also have the right to opt out of disclosures of your email address and other identifiers for the purpose of showing ads that promote Veriff across the web and in mobile apps by filling out the form included within our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
. You can also opt out by visiting our Services with a legally-recognized universal choice signal enabled (such as the Global Privacy Control). If you are not logged into your account with us, our processing of the signal will be limited to cookie-based sales, sharing, and targeted advertising for the specific browser or device that you are using.  For Visitors and Customer Representatives outside the U.S., read our
Cookie Notice
for more details regarding your controls with respect to Cookies.
(11)
Authorized agents.
You may have a right to submit a rights request via an authorized agent. If you are submitting a rights request as an authorized agent, you may be required to submit proof of your authorization to make the request, such as a valid power of attorney or proof that you have signed permission from the individual who is the subject of the request. Please do not provide any sensitive personal information in connection with this request, such as a driver's license or other government-issued ID. In some cases, we may be required to contact the individual who is the subject of the request to verify his or her own identity or confirm you have permission to submit this request. If you are an authorized agent seeking to make a request, please contact us at
privacy@veriff.com
. Any questions or requests regarding Veriff’s processing of End-User Personal Data for the provision of Services to Veriff’s Customer should be directed to that Customer who is acting as the Data Controller for Personal Data about End-Users.
8. Disclosure and transfer of Personal Data
In this section you will find information about possible disclosure and transfer of your Personal Data.
8.1
Disclosure of Personal Data to authorities
. Please note that due to legal requirements, we may be obliged to disclose or grant access to your Personal Data to the authorities and the supervisory authority (e.g. a court or a government agency).
8.2
Disclosure to Data Controllers, Data Processors and authorized recipients
. Unless stated otherwise in this Privacy Notice or noted otherwise to you separately, we may disclose your Personal Data to Data Controllers for whom we are Data Processors (e.g. Customers), to our authorized Data Processors (sub-processors) and authorized third party sites (e.g. external registries), as well as to persons who are legally entitled to receive your Personal Data (e.g., government or law enforcement request). For the Service provision, the authorized Data Processors (sub-processors) with primary locations are listed
here
and authorized third party sites are listed
here
. For example, a End-User’s Personal Data, including biometric data, can be processed by authorized sub-processors that provide identity verification core services to Veriff; Customer Representative’s Personal Data can be shared with our advertising and marketing partners, companies carrying out satisfaction surveys, debt collection agencies, credit registers, authorities and organizations intermediating or providing (electronic) mail, compliance or payment services and the like, Office Visitors Personal Data can be shared with IT and security partners, provided that:
(1) the respective purpose and the processing are lawful;
(2) we have diligently assessed that the authorized Data Processors or sub-processor will comply with the data protection requirements;
(3) the Personal Data processing is carried out in accordance with our guidelines and on the basis of a valid agreement.
(4) If you have questions about our authorized Data Processors or sub-processors, please contact us at
privacy@veriff.com
.
8.3 Please note that End-User’s Personal Data can only be shared with Veriff's sub-processors as well as to persons who are legally entitled to receive your Personal Data, if there is a valid legal basis.
8.4
Transfer of Personal Data
. In the event that we need to carry out an international data transfer, as defined by the applicable data protection laws (e.g. for utilizing the sub-processors’ services and technical infrastructure), the transfer shall be in accordance with the requirements, principles and safeguards as stated in the applicable data protection laws, such as relying on adequacy decisions issued by or standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission (or other relevant authority), or the compliance with applicable data transfer accountability requirements. While such Personal Data is outside of your country or province of residence, it may be subject to the laws of the country, province or state in which it is held, and may be subject to disclosure to the governments, courts or law enforcement or regulatory agencies of such other country, province or state pursuant to the laws of such territory. In cases where Veriff acts as the Data Controller, we make available further information on the safeguards applied (if relevant) or the extent of the transfer of Personal Data upon your request.
9. Security of Personal Data
Security is of utmost importance to us. We do our best to protect Personal Data in our hands.
9.1
We apply various
commercially reasonable measures (physical, technical, organizational)
to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized or arbitrary modifications, disclosure, acquisition, destruction, loss, theft, misuse, alteration or unauthorized access.
9.2
However, please note that electronic transmission or storage of information is not always 100% secure. Therefore, despite the security measures that we have put in place to protect Personal Data about you, we cannot guarantee that loss, misuse, or alteration of data will never occur. If you have any information about an actual or suspected data breach, please inform us immediately at
privacy@veriff.com
. We will deal with the issue immediately and inform our lead data protection supervisory authority (if applicable).
10. Retention of Personal Data
Here you can find our data retention principles that is the length of the period for which we keep Personal Data.
10.1
To determine the appropriate
retention period
, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the Personal Data and the purposes for which we process it. We must also consider periods for which we may need to retain Personal Data in order to meet our legal obligations or to deal with complaints or queries and to protect our legal rights in the event of claims being made.
10.2
We shall store your Personal Data for as long as necessary to carry out the purposes for which we originally collected it and for other business purposes explained in this Privacy Notice or as long as required by law or in accordance with the law, or for the purposes stated in this Privacy Notice. For example, there is often a statutory retention period for accounting documentation.
10.3
For the Service provision, we store the data of End-Users during the period set forth in the Agreement (we may have different data retention periods agreed upon with the Customer) or as long as it is necessary for possible establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims of End-Users, Customers or ourselves, or for anti-fraud purposes. For more information about the data retention period for the Service, you should read the privacy notice provided to you by the Customer.
10.4
For the purposes listed in section 5.2, we may store your Personal Data for a different period than agreed with Customers in the Agreement if we have a lawful basis to do so, e.g. you have given us consent to use your Personal Data  or we have assessed that we have legal basis to do so for the development of our Services or the data is anonymized.
10.5
Information about the data retention in Veriff’s Demo app and testing Veriff’s session flow can be found in section 14.
10.6
After the expiration of the Personal Data storage period, we shall anonymize or permanently erase your Personal Data. Please note that Veriff processes, maintains, and uses aggregated or de-identified information only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify such information, except as permitted by law.
11. Children’s Personal Data
Here you can find information on how we deal with children’s Personal Data.
We may process the Personal Data of children (i.e., persons under 16* years of age; *depending on jurisdiction) or adolescents (i.e., persons under 18* years of age; *or other valid online consenting age) in case the Data Controller has such End Users. In this case, the Data Controller is responsible for taking the steps to ensure that there is a legal basis and any required notice and consent requirements for such processing (e.g., a consent from a guardian of that child) have been met. If we learn that we have collected the Personal Data of a child without the guardian’s consent, we will take steps to delete the information as soon as possible.
12. Jurisdiction specific notices
You may have different rights depending on where you reside. For example, some U.S. states have enacted privacy laws that grant their residents certain rights and require specific disclosures (“State Privacy Laws”). Furthermore, you will find additional disclosures in this section if you are from Brazil. If you are done reading this section or you are not from any of the addressed jurisdictions, please click
here
or scroll up to start reading from the beginning of this Privacy Notice.
Information contained in section 12 applies as a supplement to the other information contained in this Privacy Notice. Should there be any inconsistency or ambiguity between this section and any other part of this Privacy Notice, this section shall prevail.
12.1 Additional Information for Individuals Residing in Certain U.S. States
If you reside in California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, this section applies to you. This section also serves as our California notice at collection.
Additional Disclosures
Our Privacy Notice explains how we collect (see
section 4
), use (see
section 5
), and disclose (see
section 8
) information about you, as well as our targeted advertising and analytics practices (see
sections 4
(9) and (10)). As required by certain State Privacy Laws, we use the provisions  below to explain this same information.
(1) We collect the following categories of Personal Information: identifiers, biometric information, demographic information, commercial information, internet or other electronic activity information, geolocation data, audio, electronic, or similar information, professional or employment-related information, inferences, and sensitive personal information.
(2) We collect Personal Information for the business and commercial purposes described in
section 5
. We disclose Personal Information for the business and commercial purposes described in
section 8
.
We disclose the following categories of Personal Information for business purposes to the following categories of recipients:
The following categories of Personal Information: End-User related identifiers, demographic information, commercial information, internet or other electronic activity information, geolocation data, audio, electronic, or similar information, inferences, and sensitive Personal Data; each have been disclosed to the following categories of Recipients: Data Controllers for whom we are Data Processors (e.g. Customers), our authorized Data Processors (sub-processors), authorized third party sites (e.g. external registries), and, as relevant on a case by case basis, to supervisory authorities, courts and government agencies.
The following categories of Personal Information: Customer Representative related identifiers, commercial information, internet or other electronic activity information, audio, electronic, or similar information; each have been disclosed to the following categories of Recipients: our authorized Data Processors (sub-processors), authorities and organizations intermediating or providing (electronic) mail, compliance or payment services, and, as relevant on a case by case basis, to supervisory authorities, courts and government agencies, debt collection agencies and credit registers.
The following categories of Personal Information: Customer Representative related identifiers, commercial information, electronic, or similar information; each have been disclosed to the following categories of Recipients: advertising and marketing partners, companies carrying out satisfaction surveys.
(3) As described in
section 4
above, we collect Personal Information from various sources, including directly from you, automatically when you go through the Service flow, and from third-party sources.
(4) We retain Personal Information as described in
section 10
above.
(5) We disclose certain categories of Personal Information to show you targeted ads on third-party properties, and to understand and improve your experience with our Services. These disclosures may be considered “sales”, “sharing” or use of your information for “targeted advertising” under State Privacy Laws. We have disclosed the following categories of Personal Information to the following categories of third parties for such purposes:
Identifiers may have been disclosed to advertising networks, internet service providers, data analytics providers, operating systems and platforms, and social networks.
Internet or other electronic network activity information may have been disclosed to advertising networks, internet service providers, data analytics providers, operating systems and platforms, and social networks.
(6) Our “sale,” “sharing” and “targeted advertising” activities do not apply to Personal Information that we collect in the course of providing identity verification services to our Customers. Rather, these activities relate to (1) individual Visitors browsing our website and (2) the business contact information of our Customer Representatives for purposes such as serving advertisements to those audiences on non-Veriff properties. Moreover, Veriff does not knowingly sell or share personal information about consumers under the age of 16, or higher age where required by law.
(7) We do not process sensitive Personal Information outside of our role as a Data Processor (i.e., for Service provision and permitted internal Service improvement purposes). For information about how Customers may process such information and any related rights you may have, please contact the relevant Customer directly.
(8)
Your Privacy Rights Under State Privacy Laws
The bullets below describe the rights available to you under State Privacy Laws. For additional information, such as how we verify requests, please see
section 7
above.
You have the right to opt out of activities that we engage in that constitute “targeted advertising,” “sharing,” or “sales”  at any time by following the instructions on the
“Your Privacy Choices” page
.
You have the right to (1) request to know more about and access your personal information, including in a portable format, (2) request deletion of your personal information, and (3) request correction of inaccurate personal information.  To do so, please contact our data protection officer (DPO) via email at
privacy@veriff.com
or by submitting
this form
.
Authorized Agents.
You have a right to submit a rights request via an authorized agent, you can read more about it in
section 7.4.(11)
above.
You have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of your privacy rights.
If we deny your request, you may appeal our decision by contacting us at
privacy@veriff.com
. If you have concerns about the result of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
Notice of Financial Incentives.
We may from time to time also offer various financial incentives. For example, we may provide coupons, or other benefits to Customers who participate in feedback or research surveys. If you choose to participate in a financial incentive, we collect personal information from you, such as identifiers (like your email address or phone number), professional or employment-related information, inferences drawn about your preferences, and other categories of personal data that relate to or are reasonably capable of being associated with you. More detailed information will be provided at the time of collection. You can opt into a financial incentive by following the sign-up or participation instructions provided, and, for any ongoing benefits, you can opt-out at any time, such as by following the unsubscribe instructions in the applicable program’s terms and conditions, promotional emails, or text messages, or contacting us at
privacy@veriff.com
. If you request that we delete Personal Information that is essential to providing you with the financial incentive, we will not be able to provide you with such benefits going forward. In some cases, we may provide additional terms and conditions for a financial incentive, which we will provide to you when you sign up. The value of your personal information is reasonably related to the value of the offer or discount presented to you.
12.2 Notice to Individuals Who are Residents of the State of Illinois and the State of Texas
(1) The Illinois Biometric Information Privacy Act, 740 ILCS 14/1 et seq., and the Business and Commerce Code of Texas on the Capture or Use of Biometric Identifiers, Tex.Bus.& Comm.Code § 503.001, regulates the collection, storage, use, and retention of “biometric identifiers'' and “biometric information”. “Biometric identifier” means a retina or iris scan, fingerprint, voiceprint, or scan of hand or face geometry. Biometric identifiers do not include writing samples, written signatures, photographs, human biological samples used for valid scientific testing or screening, demographic data, tattoo descriptions, or physical descriptions such as height, weight, hair color, or eye color. “Biometric information” means any information, regardless of how it is captured, converted, stored, or shared, based on an individual’s biometric identifier used to identify an individual.
(2) Veriff collects certain biometric identifiers and biometric information, namely face scan information (face geometry information and information based on that), during the identity verification process. Veriff collects and uses this information to verify your identity, prevent fraud, and provide authentication Services to our Customers on an ongoing basis.
(3) For Illinois residents, we will permanently destroy their biometric identifiers and biometric information when the initial purpose for collecting or obtaining such identifiers or information has been satisfied or within 3 years of the individual’s last interaction with Veriff’s Customers, whichever occurs first.
(4) For Texas residents, we will permanently destroy their biometric identifiers the later of (1) one year after the purpose for collecting the identifier expires, or (2) one year after any recordkeeping obligations imposed by law in connection with the collection of the biometric identifier expires.
(5) Except where prohibited by law, your biometric data and other information is accessible only to us and our service providers, which process your data only on our behalf to provide the Services. We do not share biometric data with any other third parties. Except where prohibited by law, Veriff may use your information, except for the biometric identifiers and other information of Illinois and Texas residents, for Service development (as described in sections 5.2 and 6).  The Customer on whose behalf Veriff processes your data may receive from us information about you, such as copies of the identification document and photo you provided us, and data indicating whether we were able to identify and authenticate your identity, but we do not disclose to Customers your biometric data.
(6) By clicking the relevant icons presented prior to the verification or authentication process, and choosing to continue, you acknowledge and agree that you have read the relevant disclosures, and that you voluntarily consent to Veriff’s collection, storage, retention, use, and disclosure of your data, including biometric data.
(7) Veriff uses the reasonable standards of care within its industry to store, transmit, and protect from disclosure your biometric data, in a manner that is the same as or more protective than the manner in which it stores, transmits, and protects other confidential and/or sensitive information. Veriff does not sell, lease, trade or otherwise profit from the biometric data.
12.3 Notice to Individuals From Brazil Regarding Your Privacy Rights Under Brazilian Data Protection Laws
(1) Section 12.3 is applicable to the processing of Personal Information subject to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (Law No. 13,709/2018, the “
LGPD
”, as amended) and the guidelines and regulations of the Brazilian National Data Protection Authority (the “
ANPD
”). That is, this section covers any (i) data processing that takes place in Brazil; (ii) processing activity intended to offer or supply goods or services or to process data of individuals located in Brazil; or (iii) personal data processed that was collected in Brazil (including data collected of data subjects that were in Brazil at the time of collection). Any terms defined in the LGPD have the same meaning when used in this section.
(2)
Your Rights.
The LGPD gives you specific rights to your Personal Information, as described in Article 18 et. seq. of the LGPD and below:
Right to confirmation and access:
right to obtain confirmation that your personal information is being processed, and the right to access such data.
Right to correction:
right to request correction of incomplete, inaccurate, or outdated personal information.
Right to anonymization and deletion:
right to request the transformation of personal information into anonymized data and to delete unnecessary or excessive personal information, or of personal information processed in noncompliance with the provisions of the LGPD.
Right to portability:
right to request that your personal information be transferred to another service or product supplier, according to Brazilian Data Protection Authority’s (“ANPD”) regulation, provided that the trade and industrial secrets are respected.
Right to obtain information
about the entities with whom the personal information is shared.
Right to withdrawal consent:
if the processing requires the granting of consent, you may withdraw such consent at any moment and, subsequently, request the deletion of such data.
Right to obtain information
about the possibility of not providing consent and the consequences of denial.
Right to deny:
right to deny data processing of personal information, in case the processing is not in compliance with the LGPD.
Right to review decisions taken solely by automated processing:
if decisions are taken based on automated processing (without human intervention) of personal information, and such processing could affect your interests, you may request a review of these decisions.
(3)
Contact details and information.
If you have any questions or comments about the processing of your Personal Information subject to the LGPD, including the ways in which We collect and use your Personal Information and your rights regarding such use, or have any comments, questions or concerns about this Privacy Notice, please do not hesitate to contact our Data Protection Officer MKR Consultoria Ltda at
dpo@veriff.com
.
13. Identity verification with the UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level)
Read about how Veriff handles your personal data when you are directed by the Customer to use the Service to identify yourself using the UK Digital Identity and Attribute Trust Framework (UKDIATF) Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level), for example for digital DBS, Right to Work or Right to Rent check as determined by the Customer.
This section applies to the Personal Data processing related to UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level). No specifications in this section apply to UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Low Level).
For the purposes of this section, the Service entails biometric personal identity verification as described in section 5.1 and additional activity history and identity fraud checks as described in section 13.5. Should there be any inconsistency or ambiguity between the terms of this section and any other part of this document, these terms shall prevail.
13.1
The Service is used by Veriff’s Customers to verify your identity, for example for conducting digital DBS, Right to Work or Right to Rent checks. This identity verification is conducted under the requirements foreseen in the Department for Culture, Media and Sport’s UK Digital Identity and Attributes Trust Framework (UKDIATF).
13.2
In the context of the Service, Veriff processes End-User Personal Data as directed by our Customers for the provision of the Service, whereas our Customers are the Data Controllers and Veriff is the Data Processor. Veriff is a Data Controller for compiling and retaining reports. Veriff is jointly a Data Controller with Cifas, a company registered in England and Wales under company number 02584687 and with registered office at 6th Floor Lynton House, 7-12 Tavistock Square, London WC1H 9LT (Cifas) for conducting identity fraud checks against and filing reports to the databases operated by Cifas.
13.3
Personal Data processing activities and legal basis. For offering the Service to the Customer, including for sharing your identity verification details with the Customer, Veriff relies on the legal basis ensured by the Customer, as is described in section 5.1. On the basis of Veriff’s legitimate interest in fraud (or otherwise unlawful and dishonest conduct) prevention, detection and investigation, Veriff conducts identity fraud checks against database operated by Cifas, and if Veriff suspects fraudulent activity, then Veriff may compile and retain reports and file these to Cifas. In the context of the Service, Veriff does not process your Personal Data for marketing purposes or in any other way not described in this Privacy Notice.
13.4
For the purposes of the Service, the Personal Data described in section 4.1 are being collected and processed. The Personal Data is retained as described in section 10.
13.5
Personal Data disclosures and reporting. Possible Personal Data recipients are described in section 8.1-8.3. As a part of the Service, Veriff conducts activity history and identity fraud checks. To conduct the said checks, Veriff discloses a limited set of Personal Data to (i) electoral roll and credit reference sub-processor (for M1B profile); (ii) politically exposed persons check sub-processor ComplyAdvantage (for M1B profile), and (iii) Cifas as a fraud prevention agency (for M1A and M1B profiles).
13.6
If Veriff reasonably suspects that you are committing identity fraud (or otherwise unlawful and dishonest conduct) when using the Service and as a result of the investigation Veriff determines that the fraud meets the criteria for reporting to Cifas, Veriff will submit a report to Cifas.
13.7
The Personal Data we have collected from you will be shared with fraud prevention agencies, who will use it to prevent fraud and money laundering and to verify your identity. If fraud is detected, you could be refused with certain services, finance or employment. Further details of how your Personal Data will be used by us and fraud prevention agencies, and your data protection rights, can be found by https://www.cifas.org.uk/fpn.
13.8
Your rights in relation to Personal Data. Your Personal Data is protected by legal rights, which include your right to access your Personal Data, right to object to our processing of your Personal Data and to automated decisions made about you (see also section 6.4(ii)); request that your Personal Data is erased or corrected; right to complain to your local data protection authority. Please see further information about exercising your rights in section 7.
14. Veriff's Demo app and testing Veriff's session flow
Read about testing Veriff’s session flow.
14.1
Veriff’s Demo app and website session flow allows to test and experience Veriff’s verification flow as an end user. The flow provides the experience End-Users will get when Veriff’s Customer is integrated with Veriff.
14.2
When you test the verification flow in the Demo app or on our Website, Veriff will process your data as mentioned in section 4.12. The Personal Data processed for the purpose of introducing our verification flow demo will be retained for up to 1 day.
15. Contact details and information
Here you find our contact details.
Please review this Privacy Notice carefully and contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO) at
privacy@veriff.com
if you have any comments, questions or concerns. You can also contact us via an
online form
.
16. Availability of and changes to the Privacy Notice
Here you can find information about changes made to the Privacy Notice and how we inform you about the changes.
16.1
This Privacy Notice is available on our Website.
16.2
Kindly note that we may modify the Privacy Notice from time to time. If we make changes, we will notify you of such as by revising the date of this Privacy Notice. If we make material changes, we will provide you with additional notice (such as by adding a statement to the Services or sending you a notification).
16.3
You are advised to review this Privacy Notice periodically for any changes. Changes to this Privacy Notice are effective when they are posted on this page.
Valid from: July 30, 2020
Last update: March 11, 2025
Products
Identity and Document Verification
Proof of Address
Database Verification Checks
Age Validation
KYC Onboarding
Biometric Authentication
AML Screening
Age Estimation
Fraud Protect
Fraud Intelligence
Solutions
By Industry
Financial Services
Mobility
Crypto
Gaming
Education
Healthcare
HR Management
By Use Case
New account onboarding
Age verification
Driver validation
Customer identity and access management
Right to Work
Right to Rent
Resources
Blog
Case studies
Help center
Trust Center
Documentation
Service status
Supported documents
Supported languages
About
Our story
Careers
Press
Switch language
​
English
​
©2025 Veriff. All rights reserved
Privacy notice
Cookie notice
Bug bounty
Security and compliance
Recruitment privacy notice
Accessibility statement